[2501]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported. In the pre-Islamic days fast was observed on the day of Ashura, but with the advent of Islam (its position was ascertained as that of a voluntary fast). Then he who wished to fast fasted, and he who liked to abandon it abandoned it.
[2502]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had ordered to observe fast (on 'Ashura) before the fasting in Ramadan was made obligatory. But when it became obligatory, then he who wished fasted on the day of Ashura, and he who wished did not observe it (on that day).
[2503]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Quraish used to observe fast on the day of Ashura during the pre-Islamic days. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upog him) then commanded to fast on that day till (fasting) in Ramadan became obligatory. Then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who wished to fast should do so. and he who wished to break it may do so.
[2504]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that (the Arabs of) pre-Islamic days used to observe fast on the day of Ashura and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed it and the Muslims too (observed it) before fasting in Ramadan became obligatory. But when it became obligatory, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: 'Ashura is one of the days of Allah, so he who wished should observe fast and he who wished otherwise should abandon it.
[2505]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abdullah through the same chain of transmitters.
[2506]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said that the day of 'Ashura was mentioned before the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him). Thereupon the Messenger of Allah,(may peace be upon him) said: That was a day on which the people of pre-Islamic days used to observe fast. So he who amongst you likes to observe fast should do so, and he who does not like it should abandon it.
[2507]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say about the day of Ashura: It is a day on which the people of pre-Islamic days observed fast. So he who liked to fast on this day should do so, and he who liked to abandon it should abandon it. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) did not observe fast except when it coincided (with the days when he was in the habit of observing voluntary fasts during every month).
[2508]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the day of 'Ashura was mentioned before the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he narrated a hadith like one (narrated above).
[2509]
'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the day of 'Ashura was mentioned before the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: It is a day when the people in the pre-Islamic days need to observe fast, so he who wishes to observe fast should do so, and he who wishes to abandon it should do so.
[2510]
Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid said: When al-Ash'ath b. Qais entered the house of 'Abdullah he was having his breakfast. He ('Abdullah b. Umar) said: Abd Muhammad (al-Asha'th), come near to the breakfast. Thereupon he said: Is not today the day of 'Ashura? He ('Abd al-Rahman) said: Do you know what the day of 'Ashura is? He said: What is it? He said: It is a day on which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe fast before the (fasting) in the month of Ramadan (became) obligatory. But when it became obligatory the (fasting of 'Ashura) was abandoned (as compulsory). Abu Kuraib said: He (the Holy Prophet) abandoned it.
[2511]
This hadith has been narrated from Jarir on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters and he said (these words with a little bit of variation from the previous hadith) : When (fasting) in Ramadan was (made) obligatory, he aban- doned it (the practice of observing fast on Ashura).
[2512]
Qais b Sakan reported that al-Ash'ath b. Qais went to 'Abdullah on the day of 'Ashura while he was eating. He said: Abu Muhammad, come near and dine. Upon this he said: I am fasting. Thereupon he said: We used to observe fast and then (this practice) was abandoned.
[2513]
'Alqama reported that Ash'ath b. Qais went to Ibn Mas'udd while he was eating on the day of Ashura. Thereupon he said: Abu Abd al-Rahman, it is the day of 'Ashura (and you are eating). Upon this he said: Fast was observed on (this day) before the (fasting) in Ramadan was made obligatory, but when it was made obligatory, (fasting on the day of 'Ashura) was abandoned. So if you are not fasting, then take food.
[2514]
Jabir b Samura reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to observe fast on the day of Ashura and exhorted us to do it and was particular about it But when (fasting) in Ramadan was made obligatory, he hence. forth neither commanded us nor forbade us, nor was he so particular about it.
[2515]
Abd al-Rahman reported that he heard Mu'awiya b. Abu Sufyan delivering a sermon in Medina. i.e. when he came there (for Hajj). He delivered a sermon on the day of 'Ashura and said: People of Medina, where are your scholars? I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say on this very day: It is the day of 'Ashura. Allah has not made fasting on This day obligatory for you but I am fasting. He who likes to observe fast among you should do so, and he who likes not to observe it may not observe it.
[2516]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab through the same chain of transmitters.
[2517]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters that be heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying on a similar day: I am fasting today, so he who wishes to observe fast should do so; but he did not make mention of the rest of the hadith.
[2518]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Medina, he found the Jews observing the fast on the day of Ashura. They (the Jews) were asked about it and they said: It is the day on which Allah granted victory to Moses and (his people) Bani Isra'il over the Pharaoh and we observe fast out of gratitude to Him. Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: We have a closer connection with Moses than you have, and he commanded to observe fast on this day.
[2519]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Bishr with the same chain of trans- mitters (but with a slight variation) that he (the Holy Prophet) inquired of them (Jews) about it (fasting on the day of 'Ashura).
[2520]
Ibn'Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) arrived in Medina and found the Jews observing fast on the day of 'Ashura. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to them: What is the (significance) of this day that you observe fast on it? They said: It is the day of great (significance) when Allah delivered Moses and his people, and drowned the Pharaoh and his people, and Moses observed fast out of gratitude and we also observe it. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: We have more right, and we have a closer connection with Moses than you have; so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed fast (on the day of 'Ashura), and gave orders that it should be observed.
[2521]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ayyub with the same chain of transmitters.
[2522]
Abu Musa (Allah be pleased with him) reported: The day of 'Ashura was one which the Jews respected and they treated it as Id. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You also observe fast on this day.
[2523]
Abu Musa reported that the people of Khaibar (most of them were Jews) observed fast on tht day of 'Ashura and they treated it as 'Id and gave their women ornaments and beautiful dresstowear. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You (only) observe fast on this day.
[2524]
Ibn Abbas was asked about observing of fast on the day of Ashura, whereupon he said: I do not know Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) singling out any day's fast and considering it more excellent than another, except this day (the day of Ashura) and this month, meaning the month of Ramadan.
[2525]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah b. Abi Yazid.
[2526]
Hakam b. al-'Araj reported: I went to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be Pleased with both of them) and he was reclining using his mantle as a pillow near the fountain of Zamzam. I said to him: Tell me about fasting on Ashura. He said: When you see the new moon of Muharram then count the (days) and observe fast on the 9th. I said to him: Is it how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the fast? He said: Yes.
[2527]
Hakam b. 'Araj reported: I asked Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) as he was reclining using his cloak as a pillow near Zamzam about fasting on 'Ashura. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2528]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fasted on the day of 'Ashura and commanded that it should he observed as a fast, they (his Companions) said to him : Messenger of Allah, it is a day which the Jews and Christians hold in high esteem. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the next year comes, God willing, we would observe fast on the 9th But the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) died before the advent of the next year.
[2529]
Abdullah b 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: If I live till the next (year), I would definitely observe fast on the 9th, and the narration transmitted by Abu Bakr is: "He meant the day of Ashura."
[2530]
Salama b. al-Akwa' (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent a person of the tribe of Aslam on the day of 'Ashura and commanded him to declare to the people to observe fast in case they had not observed it, and to complete fast till evening if they had taken food
[2531]
Rubayyi' daughter of Mu'awwidh b. 'Afra' said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent (a person) on the morning of Ashura to the villages of Ansar around Medina (with this message): He who got up in the morning fasting (without eating anything) he should complete his fast, and he who had had his breakfast in the morning, he should complete the rest of the day (without food). The Companions said; We henceforth observed fast on it (on the day of 'Ashura) and, God willing, made our children observe that. We went to the mosque and made toys out of wool for them and when anyone felt hungry and wept for food we gave them these toys till it was the time to break the fast.
[2532]
Khalid b. Dhakwan reported: I asked Rubayyi' daugther of Mu'awwidh about fasting on the day of 'Ashura. Thereupon she said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) sent his messenger to the villages of the Ansar, and the rest of the hadith is the same (but with this variation that one of the Companions) said: "We used to make toys out of wool and took (them to the mosque) along with us. When they (the children)asked us for food, we gave them these toys to play with, and these made them forgetful till they completed their fast."
[2533]
Abu Ubaid, the freed slave of Ibn Azhar, reported: I observed Id along with Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with him). He came (out in an open space) and prayed and (after) completing it addressed the people and said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has forbidden the observing of fast on these two days. One is the day of Fitr (at the end of your fasts), and the second one, the day when you eat (the meat) of your sacrifices.
[2534]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade to observe fast on these two days. 'Id-ul-Adha bi and 'Id-ul-Fitr.
[2535]
Qaza'a related from Abu Sa'id. He said: I heard from him (Abu Sa'id) a hadith which impressed me, and I said to him: Did you hear it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? Thereupon he said: (Is it possible) that (I should) say about the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that which I have not heard? I heard him saying: It is not proper to fast on two days, Adha and Fitr (at the end) of Ramadan.
[2536]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade to observe fast on two days the day of Fitr and the day of Sacrifice ('Id-ul-Adha).
[2537]
Ziyad b. Jubair reported that a person came to Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) and said: I had taken a vow that I would fast on the day (but it accidentally) synchronises with the day of Adha or the day of Fitr. Thereupon Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) said: Allah, the Exalted, has commanded fulfilling of the vow, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has forbidden the observance of fast on this day.
[2538]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said that the Prophet (may peace be upon him) forbade to observe fast on two days-the day of Fitr and the day of Adha.
[2539]
Nubaisha al-Hudhali reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The days of Tashriq are the days of eating and drinking.
[2540]
Nabaisha reported that Khalid said: I met Abu Malih and asked him and he narrated it to me from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). a hadith like one (narrated above) with this addition: "And remembrance of Allah"
[2541]
Ibn Ka'b b. Malik reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent him and Aus b. Hadathan during the days of Tashriq to make this announcement: None but the believer would be admitted into Paradise, and the days of Mina' are the days meant for eating and drinking.
[2542]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibrahim b. Tahman with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation that he said: Both of them made the announcement."
[2543]
Muhammad b. 'Abbas b. Ja'far reported: I asked Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with both of them) as he was circumambulating the House (Ka'ba) whether the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had forbidden the fasting on Friday, whereupon he said: Yes, by the Lord of this House.
[2544]
Muhammad b. 'Abbas b. Ja'far reported that he asked Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them), whether he had heard like this from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2545]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: None among you should observe fast on Friday, but only that he observes fast before it and after it.
[2546]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not single out the night (preceding) Friday among the nights for prayer and do not single out Friday among days for fasting but only when anyone among you is accustomed to fast (on dates) which coincide with this day (Friday).
[2547]
Salama b. Akwa' (Allah be pleased with him) reported that when this verse was revealed: "And as for those who can fast (but do not) expiation is the feeding of a needy person" (ii. 183), (he who liked to observe fast did observe it) and he who felt reluctant to observe it ate and expiated till the verse was revealed which abro- gated it.
[2548]
Salama b. Akwa' reported: We, during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), in one month of Ramadan (observed fast according to our liking). He who wished to fast lasted and he who wished to break broke it and fed a needy person as an expiation 1544 till this verse was revealed: "He who witnesses among you the month (of Ramadan) he should observe fast during it" (ii. 184).
[2549]
Abu Salama reported: I heard 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) as saying: I had to complete some of the fasts of Ramadan, but I could not do it but during the month of Sha'ban due to my duties to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) or with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2550]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation that he said that ('A'isha did not observe fast but in Sha'ban) out of regard for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). (In another version, the words are): "Yahya said: I think it was due to the regard for the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[2551]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Yahya with the same chain of transmitters but no mention is made of the duty to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2552]
'A'isha reported: If one amongst us had to break fasts (of Ramadan due to natural reasons, i.e. menses) during the life of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) she could not find it possible to complete them so long she had been in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) till Sha'ban commenced.
[2553]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone dies in a state (that he had to complete) some fasts, his heir must fast on his behalf.
[2554]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: A woman came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: My mother has died, and fasts of a month are due from her. Thereupon he said: Don't you see that if debt was due from her, would you not pay it? She said: Yes (I would pay on her behalf). Thereupon he said: The debt of Allah deserves its payment more than (the payment of anyone else).
[2555]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: A man came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, my mother has died (in a state) that she had to observe fasts of a month (of Ramadan). Should I complete (them) on her behalf? thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Would you not pay the debt if your mother had died (without paying it)? He said: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) said: The debt of Allah deserves more that it should he paid.
[2556]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2557]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported:A woman came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, my mother has died and there is due from her a fast of vow; should I fast on her behalf? Thereupon he said: You see that if your mother had died in debt, would it not have been paid on her behalf? She said: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Then observe fast on behalf of your mother.
[2558]
Abdullah b. Buraida (Allah be pleased with him) reported on the authority of his father: When we were sitting with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), a woman came to him and said: I had gifted to my mother a maid-servant, and now she (the mother) has died. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: There is a definite reward for you and she (the maid-servant) has been returned to you as an inheritance. She (that woman) again said: Fasts of a month (of Ramadan) are due upon her; should I observe them on her behalf ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Observe fasts on her behalf. She (again) said: She did not perform Hajj , should I perform it on her behalf? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Perform Hajj on her behalf.
[2559]
'Abdullah b. Buraida (Allah be pleased with him) reported on the authority of his father: I was sitting with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him); the rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation that the (the narrator) said: "Fasts of two months."
[2560]
Ibn Buraida (Allah be pleased with him) reported on the authority of his father: A woman came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), and the rest of the hadith is the same, but he said: "Fasting of one month." This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyan with the same chain of transmitters in which it is said: "Fasting of two months."
[2561]
Buraida (Allah be pleased with him) reported a similar hadith on the authority of his father that a woman came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: "Fasting for one month."
[2562]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: If any one of you is invited to a meal when he is fasting, he should say: "I am fasting."
[2563]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: When any one of you gets up in the morning in the state of fasting, he should neither use obscene language nor do any act of ignorance. And if anyone slanders him or quarrels with him, he should say: "I am fasting, I am fasting."
[2564]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Majestic and the Exalted, said: Every act of the son of Adam is for him except fasting. It is done for My sake, and I will give a reward for it. By Allah in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, the breath of the observer of fast is sweeter to Allah than the fragrance of musk.
[2565]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fasting is a shield.
[2566]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah the Exalted and Majestic said: Every act of the son of Adam is for him, except fasting. It is (exclusively) meant for Me and I (alone) will reward it. Fasting is a shield. When any one of you is fasting on a day, he should neither indulge in obscene language, nor raise the voice; or if anyone reviles him or tries to quarrel with him he should say: I am a person fasting. By Him, in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, the breath of the observer of fast is sweeter to Allah on the Day of judgment than the fragrance of musk. The one who fasts has two (occasions) of joy, one when he breaks the fast he is glad with the breaking of (the fast) and one when he meets his Lord he is glad with his fast.
[2567]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Every (good) deed of the son of Adam would be multiplied, a good deed receiving a tenfold to seven hundredfold reward. Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, has said: With the exception of fasting, for it is done for Me and I will give a reward for it, for one abandons his passion and food for My sake. There are two occasions of joy for one who fasts, joy when he breaks it, and joy when he meets his Lord, and the breath (of an observer of fast) is sweeter to Allah than the fragrance of musk.
[2568]
Abu Huraira and Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (as saying): Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, said: Fast (is exclusively) meant for Me and I would give its reward. There are two (occasions) of joy for the observer of fast. He feels joy when he breaks the fast and he is happy when he meets Allah. By Allah in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, the breath of the observer of fast is sweeter to Allah than the fragrance of musk. A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Abu Sinan with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "As he meets Allah, He rewards him, and he is happy."
[2569]
Sahl b. Sa'd (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: In Paradise there is a gate which is called Rayyan through which only the observers of fast would enter on the Day on Resurrection. None else would enter along with them. It would be proclaimed: Where are the observers of fast that they should be admitted into it?-and when the last of them would enter, it would be closed and no one would enter it.
[2570]
Abu Sa'id al Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Every servant of Allah who observes fast for a day in the way of Allah, Allah would remove, because of this day, his face farther from the Fire (of Hell) to the extent of seventy years' distance.
[2571]
This hadith has been narrated by Suhail with the ,arne chainof trausmitters.
[2572]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who observes fast for a day in the way of Allah He would remove his face from the Hell to the extent of seventy years' distance.
[2573]
'A'isha, the Mother of the Believers (Allah be pleased with her), reported that one day the Messenger of Allah tpay peace be upon him) said to me: 'A'isha, have you anything (to eat)? I said:'Messenger of Allah, there is nothing with us. Thereupon he said: I am observing fast. She said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out, and there was a present, for us and (at the same time) some visitors dropped in. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came back, I said to him: Messenger of Allah, a present was given to us, (and in the meanwhile) there came to us visitors (a major Portion of it has been spent on them), but I have saved something for you. He said: What is it? I said: It is hais (a compound of dates and clarified butter). He said: Bring that. So I brought it to him and he ate it and then said: I woke up in the morning observing fast. Talha said: I narrated this hadith to Mujahid and he said: This (observing of voluntary fast) is like a person who sets apart Sadaqa out of his wealth. He may spend it if he likes, or he may retain it if he so likes.
[2574]
'A'isha, the Mother of the Believers (Allah be pleased with her), reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me one day and said: Is there anything with you (to eat) ? I said: No. Thereupon he said: I shall then be fasting. Then he came to us another day and we said: Messenger of Allah, hais has been offered to us as a gift. Thereupon he said: Show that to me; I had been fasting since morning. He then ate it.
[2575]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone forgets that he is fasting and eats or drinks he should complete his fast, for it is only Allah Who has fed him and given him drink.
[2576]
Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I said to'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her): Did the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observe fast for full one month besides Ramadan? She said: I do not know of any month in which he fasted through- out, but that of the month of Ramadan and (the month) in which he did not fast at all, till he ran the course of his life.
[2577]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I said to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her): Did the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observe fast during a month? She said, I do not know of any month in which he fasted throughout except Ramedan and (the month) in which he did not fast at all till he ran the course of his life. May peace be upon him.
[2578]
Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported. I asked 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) about fasting of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: He used to observe fast (at times) so continuously that we said: He has fasted, he has fasted. And (at times) he did not observe fast (for days) and we began to say: He has abandoned fasting, he has abandoned fasting. She said: I did not see him observing fast throughout the whole of the month since he arrived in Medina, but that of Ramadan.
[2579]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abdullah b. Shaqiq but in the chain of transmitters no mention is made of Hisham and Muhammad.
[2580]
'A'isha, the Mother of the Believers (Allah be pleased with her), reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe fasts (so conti- nuously) that we said that he would not break, and did not observe (them) till we said that he would not fast: and I did not see the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) completing the fast of a month, but that of Ramadan, and I did not see him fasting more in any other month than that of Sha'ban.
[2581]
Abu Salama reported: I asked 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) about the fasting of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: He used to observe fast (at times so continuously) that we said: He has fasted (never to break), and he did not observe fast till we said: He has given up perhaps never to fast, and I never saw him observing (voluntary fasts) more in any other month than that of Sha'ban.(lt appeared as if) he observed fast throughout the whole of Sha'ban except a few (days).
[2582]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not observe fast in any month of the year more than in the month of Sha'ban, and used to say: Do as many deeds as you are capable of doing, for Allah will not become weary (of giving you reward), but you would be tired (of doing good deeds); and he also said: The deed liked most by Allah is one to which the doer adheres constantly even if it is small.
[2583]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: The Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him) did not fast throughout any month except during ramadan. And when he observed fast (he fasted so continuously) that one would say that he would not break (them) and when he Abandoned, he abandoned (so continuously) that one would say: By Allah, perhaps he would never fast.
[2584]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Bishr with the same chain of transmitters (with a slight variation of words and these are), that he (the narrator) said: "During any month continuously since he came to Medina."
[2585]
'Uthman b. Hakim al-Ansari said: I asked Sa'id b. Jubair about fasting In Rajab, and we were then passing through the month of Rajab, whereupon he said: I heard Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) as saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe fast (so continuously) that we (were inclined) to say that he would not break (them) and did not observe them so conti- nuously) that we (were inclined to say) that he would not observe fast.
[2586]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe fast till it was said that he had observed fast, he had observed fast (perhaps never to break it), and he did not fast till it was said that he had given up fast, he had given up fast (perhaps never to observe it).
[2587]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was informed that he could stand up for (prayer) throughout the night and observe fast every day so long as he lived. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Is it you who said this? I said to him: Messenger of Allah. it is I who said that. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah may peace be upon him) said: You are not capable enough to do so. Observe fast and break it; sleep and stand for prayer, and observe fast for three days during the month; for every good is multiplied ten times and this is like fasting for ever. I said: Messenger of Allah. I am capable of doing more than this. Thereupon he said: Fast one day and do not fast for the next two days. I said: Messenger of Allah, I have the strength to do more than that. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him), said: Fast one day and break on the other day. That is known as the fasting of David (peace be upon him) and that is the best fasting. I said: I am capable of doing more than this. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: There is nothing better than this. 'Abdullah b. 'Amr (Allah be pleased with them) said: Had I accepted the three days (fasting during every month) as the Messeinger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said, it would have been more dear to me than my family and my property.
[2588]
Yahya reported: I and 'Abdullah b. Yazid set out till we came to Abu Salama. We sent a messenger to him (in his house in order to inform him about our arrival) and he came to us. There was a mosque near the door of his house, and we were in that mosque, till he came out to us. He said: If you like you may enter (the house) and, if you like, you may sit here (in the mosque). We said: We would rather sit here and (you) relate to us. He (Yahya) then narrated that 'Abdullah b Amr b. al-'As (Allah be pleased with them) told him: I used to observe fast uninterruptedly and recited the (whole of the) Qur'an every night. It (the uninterrupted fasting and recital of the Qur'in every night) was mentioned to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) or he sent for me, and I went to him and he said to me: I have been informed that you fast continuously and recite (the whole of the Qur'An) every night. I said: Apostle of Allah, it is right, but I covet thereby nothing but good, whereupon he said: It suffices for you that you should observe fast for three days during every mouth. I said: Apostle of Allah, I am capable of doing more than this. He said: Your wife has a right upon you, your visitor has a right upon you, your body has a right upon you; so observe the fast of David, the Apostle of Allah (peace be upon him), for he was the best worshipper of Allah. I said: Apostle of Allah, what is the fast of David? He said: He used to fast one day and did not fast the other day. He (also) said: Recite the Qur'an during every month. I said: Apostle of Allah, I am capable of doing more than this, whereupon he said : Recite it in twenty days; recite it in ten days. I said: I am capable of doing more than this, whereupon he said: Recite it every week, and do not exceed beyond this, for your wife has a right upon you, your visitor has a right upon you, your body has a right upon you. He ('Amr b. 'As) said: I was hard to myself and thus I was put to hardship. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had told me: 'You do not know you may live long (thus and bear the hardships for a long time), and I accepted that which the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had told me. When I grew old I wished I had availed myself of the conces- sion (granted by) the Apostle of Allah (may-peace be upon him). This hadith has been narrated by Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters and he made this addition after these words: During every month, (fasting) for three days, there is for you ten times for every good and that is perpetual fasting (for three days would bring a reward for full thirty days). I said: What is the fast of the Apostle of Allah, David? He said: Half of the age (observing fast on alternate days for the whole life). And in the hadith no mention has been made of the recital of the Qur'an, and he did not say: Your visitor has a right upon you, but (instead) he said: Your son has a right upon you.
[2589]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr (Allah be pleased with them) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: Recite the whole of the Qur'An during every nonth. I said : I find power (to recite it) in a shorter period. He said: Then recite it in twenty nights. I said: I find power (to recite it in a shorter period even than this), whereupon he said: Then recite it in seven (nights) and do not exceed beyond it.
[2590]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: 'Abdullah, don't be like so and so who observed prayer during the whole night and then abandoned it (altogether).
[2591]
Abdu'llah b. 'Amr b. 'As (Allah be pleased with them) reported: It was conveyed to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that I observe fast succes- sively and pray during the whole night. He sent for me or I met him and he (the Holy Prophet) said: It has been conveyed to me that you observe fast continuously and do not break it and pray during the whole night. Don't do that. for there is share for your eyes, share for your own self, share for your family; so observe fast and break it, pray and sleep and observe fast for one day during the ten days, and there is a reward for you (for other) nine (days besides the tenth day of the fast). I said: Apostle of Allah, I find myself more powerful than this. He said: Then observe the fast of David (peace be upon him). He ('Amr) said: Apostle of Allah, how did David observe fast? He (the Holy Prophet) said: He used to fast one day and break it on the other day, and he did not run (from the battlefield) as he encountered (the enemy). He said: Apostle of Allah, who can guarantee this for me (will I also encounter the enemy dauntlessly)? 'Ata', the narrator of the hadith, said: I do not know how there (crept in) the matter of perpetual fast. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), however, said: He who observed perpetual fast did not fast at all; he who observed perpetual fast did not fast at all, he who observed perpetual fast did not fast at all. This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters. Imam Muslim has narrated this hadith on the authority of Abu 'Abbas al-Sa'ib b. Farrukh and he was a trustworthy and reliable (narrator) among the people of Mecca.
[2592]
Abdullah b. Amr (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: 'Abdullah b. Amr, you fast continuously and stand in prayer for the whole of night. If you do like that, your eyes would be highly strained and would sink and lose sight. There is no (reward for) fasting (for him) who fasts perpetually. Fasting for three days during the month is like fasting, the whole of the month. I said: I am capable of doing more than this, whereupon he said: Observe the fast of David. He used to fast one day and break (the other) day. And he did not turn back in the encounter.
[2593]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Habib b. Abu Thabit with the same chain of transmitters and he said: "And you would become exhausted."
[2594]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: I have been informed that you stand for prayer the whole of night and fast during the day. I said: I do that, whereupon he said: If you did that you in fact strained heavily your eyes and made yourself weak. There is a right of your eyes (upon you) and a right of your self (upon you) and a right of your family (upon you). Stand for prayer and sleep. observe fasts and break (them).
[2595]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: With Allah the best fasting is that of David and the best prayer is that of David (peace be upon him) for he slept half of the night and stood for prayer for the third of it and (then) slept the sixth part of it and he observed fast one day and broke on the other.
[2596]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best fasting in the eye of Allah is that of David, for he fasted for half of the age (he fasted on alternate days), and the best prayer in the eye of Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, is that of David (peace be upon him), for he slept for half of the night and then stood for prayer and then again slept. He prayed for one-third of the night after midnight. He (the narrator) said: I asked 'Amr b. Dinar whether 'Amr b. Aus said that he stood for prayer one-third of the night after midnight. He said: Yes.
[2597]
Abu Qatada reported that Abu al Malih informed me: I went along with your father to 'Abdullah b. Amr, and he narrated to us that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was informed about my fasting and he came to me, and I placed a leather cushion filled with fibre of date-palms for him. He sat down upon the ground and there was that cushion between me and him, and he said to me: Does three days' fasting in a month not suffice you? I said: Messenger of Allah, (I am capable of observing more fasts). He said: (Would) five (not suffice for you) ? I said: Messenger of Allah, (I am capable of observing more fasts) He said: (Would) seven (fasts) not suffice you? I said: Messenger of Allah, (I am capable of observing more fasts). He (the Holy Prophet) then said: (Would) nine (fasts not suffice you)? I said: Messenger of Allah, (I am capable of observing more fasts). He said: (Would) eleven (fasts not suffice you)? I said: Messenger of Allah, (I am capable of observing more fasts than these). Thereupon the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: There is no fasting (better than) the fasting of David which comprises half of the age, fasting a day and not fasting a day.
[2598]
'Abdullah b. Amr (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said to him: Observe fast for a day and there would be reward for you for the rest (of the days). He said: I am capable of doing more than this. He then said: Observe fast for two days, and there would be reward for you for the rest (of the days). He said: I am capable of doing more than this. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Observe fast for three days and there would be reward for you for the rest of the days. He said: I am capable of doing more than this, whereupon he said: Observe fast for four days and there would be reward for you for the rest of the days. He said: I am capable of doing more than this. Thereupon he said: Then observe fast (which is the) best in the eye of Allah, the fast of David (peace be upon him); he used to observe fast one day and break on the other day.
[2599]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me ! 'Abdullah b. 'Amr, it has been conveyed to me that you observe fast during the day and stand in prayer during the whole night. Don't do that, for your body has a share of its own in you, your eye has a share of its own in you, your wife has a share of her own in you. Observe fast and break it too. Fast for three days in every month and that is a prepetual fasting. I said! Messenger of Allah, I have got strength enough (to do more than this), whereupon he said: Then observe the fast of David (peace be upon him). Observe fast one day and break it (on the other) day. And he ('Abdullah b. 'Amr) used to say: Would that I had availed myself of this concession.
[2600]
Mu'adha al-'Adawiyya reported that she asked 'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), whether the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed fasts for three days during every month. She said: Yes I said to her: Which were (the particular) days of the month on which he observed fast? She said: He was not particular about the days of the month on which to observe fast.
[2601]
'Imran b. Husain (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him (or he said to another person and he was listening to it): O, so and so, did you observe fast in the middle of the month? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Messenger of Allah) said: When you break it, then observe fast for two days.
[2602]
Abu Qatada reported that a person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: How do you observe fast? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) felt annoyed.1560 When 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) noticed his annoyance, he said: We are well pleased with Allah as our Lord, with Islam as our Code of Life, and with Muhammad as our Prophet. We seek refuge with Allah from the anger of Allah and that of His Messenger. 'Umar kept on repeating these words till his (the Prophet's) anger calmed down. Then Umar said: Messenger of Allah. what is the position of one who perpetually observes fasts? Thereupon he said: He neither fasted nor broke it, or he said: He did not fast and he did not break it. He said: What about him who observes fast for two days and breaks one day. There- upon he said: Is anyone capable of doing it? He ('Umar) said: What is the position of him who observes fast for a day and breaks on the other day? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: That is the fast of David (peace be upon him). He ('Umar) said: What about him who observes fast one day and breaks it for two days. Thereupon he (the Messenger of Allah) said: I wish,I were given strength to observe that. Thereafter he said: The observance of three days' fast every Month and that of Ramadan every year is a perpetual fasting. I seek from Allah that fasting on the day of 'Arafa may atone for the sins of the preceding and the coming years. and I seek from Allah that fasting on the day of Ashura may atone for the sins of the preceding year.
[2603]
Abu Qatada al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about his fasting. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) felt annoyed. Thereupon 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) said: We are pleased with Allah as the Lord, with Islam as our Code of Life, with Muhammad as the Messenger and with our pledge (to you for willing and cheerful submission) as a (sacred) commitment. He was then asked about perpetual fasting, whereupon he said: He neither fasted nor did he break it,or he did not fast and he did not break it. He was then asked about fasting for two days and breaking one day. He (the Holy Prophet) said: And who has strength enough to do it? He was asked about fasting for a day and breaking for two days, whereupon he said: May Allah bestow upon us strength to do it. He was then asked about fasting for a day and breaking on the other, whereupon he said: That is the fasting of my brother David (peace be upon him). He was then asked about fasting on Monday, whereupon he said: It was the day on which I was born. on which I was commissioned with prophethood or revelation was sent to me, (and he further) said: Three days' fasting every month and of the whole of Ramadan every year is a perpetual fast. He was asked about fasting on the day of 'Arafa (9th of Dhu'I-Hijja), whereupon he said: It expiates the sins of the preceding year and the coming year. He was asked about fasting on the day of 'Ashura (10th of Muharram), whereupon be said: It expiates the sins of the preceding year. (Imam Muslim said that in this hadith there is a) narration of Imam Shu'ba that he was asked about fasting on Monday and Thursday, but we (Imam Muslim) did not mention Thursday for we found it as an error (in reporting).
[2604]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2605]
This hadith has been narrated by Ghailan b. Jarir with the same chain of transmitters, but with one variation, that there has been made mention of Monday and not of Thursday.
[2606]
Abu Qatada Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Massenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about fasting on Monday, whereupon he said: It is (the day) when I was born and revelation was sent down to me.
[2607]
'Imran b. Husain (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) having said to him or to someone else: Did you fast in the middle of Sha'ban? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: If you did not observe fast, then you should observe fast for two days.
[2608]
Imran b. Husain (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (way peace heupon him) said. to a person: Did you observe any fast in the middle of this month (Sha'ban)? He said: No. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Fast for two days instead of (one fast) when you have completed (fasts of) Ramadan.
[2609]
'Imran b. Husain (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to a person: Did you observe fast in the middle of this month. i.e. Sha'ban? He said: No. Thereupon he said to him: When it is the end of Ramadan, then observe fast for one day or two (Shu'ba had some doubt about it) but he said: I think that he has said: two days.
[2610]
This hadith is narrated by 'Abdullah b. Hani b. Akhi Mutarrif with the same chain of transmitters.
[2611]
Abu Haraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most excellent fast after Ramadan is God's month. al-Muharram, and the most excellent prayer after what is prescribed is prayer during the night.
[2612]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that he (the Messenger of Allah) was asked as to which prayer was most excellent after the prescribed prayer, and which fast was most excellent after the month of Ramadan. He said: Prayer offered in the middle of the night and the most excellent fast after (fasting) in the month of Ramadan is the fast in God's month al-Muharram.
[2613]
A hadith like this has been reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) by 'Abd al-Malik with the same chain of transmitters in connection with fast.
[2614]
Abu Ayyub al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who observed the fast of Ramadan and then followed it with six (fasts) of Shawwal. it would be as if he fasted perpetually.
[2615]
Abu Ayyub al-Ansari reported (through another chain of transmitters): I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying like this.
[2616]
Abu Ayyub reported a hadith like this (through another chain of transmitters).
[2617]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that some persons among the Companions of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) were shown Lailat- ul-Qadr while sleeping in the last week (of Ramadan). Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I see that your dreams agree regarding the last week; so he who wants to seek it should seek it in the last week (during the night).
[2618]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Seek Lailat-ul-Qadr in the last week (of Ramadan).
[2619]
Salim reported on the authority of his father that a person saw Lailat-ul- Qadr on the 27th (of Ramadan).Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: I see that your dreams agree regarding the last ten (nights of Ramadan). So seek it on an odd number (of these ten nights).
[2620]
Salim b. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that his father said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: So far as Lailat-ul-Qadr is concerned. some persons among you have seen it (in a dream) in the first week and some persons among you have been shown that it is in the last week; so seek it in the last ten (nights).
[2621]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Seek it (Lailat-ul-Qadr) in the last (ten nights).If one among you shows slackness and weakness (in the earlier part of Ramadan), it should not be allowed to prevail upon him in the last week.
[2622]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who is anxious to seek it (Lailat-ul-Qadr) should seek it in the last ten (nights of Ramadan).
[2623]
'Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Seek the time of Lailat-ul-Qadr in the last (ten nights), or he said: in the last nine (nights).
[2624]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I was shown Lailat-ul-Qadr; then some members of my family awoke me up, then I was caused to forget it. So seek it in the last week. Harmala said: (The Holy Prophet did not say: "I was made to forget," but he stated): "But I forgot it."
[2625]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) spent in devotion (in i'tikaf) the middle ten nights of the month of Ramadan, and when twenty nights were over and it was the twenty-first night, he went back to his residence and those who were along with him also returned (to their respective residences).He spent one month in devotion.Then he addressed the people on the night he came back (to his residence) and commanded them as Allah desired (him to command) and then said: I used to devote myself (observe i'tikaf) during these ten (nights).Then I started devoting myself in the last ten (nights).And he who desires to observe i'tikaf along with me should spend the night) at his place of i'tikaf. And I saw this night (Lailat-ul-Qadr) but I forgot it (the exact night); so seek it ;In the last ten nights on odd numbers. I saw (the glimpses of that dream) that I was prostrating in water and mud.Abu Sa'id al-Khudri said: It rained on the twenty-first night and the water dripped (from the roof) of the mosque at the place where the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed prayer. I looked at him and as he completed the dawn prayer, (I found) his face was wet with mud and water.
[2626]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) devoted (himself to prayer) in the middle (ten nights) of Ramadan. The rest of the hadith is the same except for these words: "That he adhered to his place of i'tikaf and his forehead was besmeared with mud and water."
[2627]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed i'tikaf (confined himself for devotion and prayer) in the first ten (days) of Ramadan; he then observed i'tikaf in the middle ten (days) in a Turkish tent with a mat hanging at its door. He (the Holy Prophet) took hold of that mat and placed it in the nook of the tent. He then put his head out and talked with people and they came near him, and he (the Holy Prophet) said: I observed i'tikaf in the first ten (nights and days) in order to seek that night (Lailat-ul-Qadr). I then observed i'tikaf in the middle ten days. Then (an angel) was sent to me and I was told that this (night) is among the last ten (nights). He who among you likes to observe i'tikaf should do so; and the people observed it along with him, and he (the Holy Prophet) said: That (Lailat-ul-Qadr) was shown to me on an odd (night) and I (saw in the dream) that I was prostrating in the morning in clay and water. So in the morning of the twenty-first night when he (the Holy Prophet) got up for dawn (prayer). there was a rainfall and the mosque dripped, and I saw clay and water. When he came out after completing the morning prayer (I saw) that his forehead and the tip of his nose had (traces) of clay and water, and that was the twenty-first night among the last ten (nights).
[2628]
Abu Salama reported:'We discussed amongst ourselves Lailat-ul-Qadr. I came to Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) who was a friend of mine and said to him: Would you not go with us to the garden of date trees? He went out with a cloak over him. I said to him: Did you hear the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) making mention of Lailat-ul-Qadr? He said: Yes, (and added) we were observing i'tikaf with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the middle ten days of Ramadan, and came out on the morning of the twentieth and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) addressed us and said: I was shown Lailat-ul-Qadr, but I forgot (the exact night) or I was caused to forget it, so seek it in the last ten odd (nights), and I was shown that I was prostrating in water and clay. So he who wanted to observe i'tikaf with the Messenger of Allah (inay peace be upon him) should return (to the place of i'tikaf). He (Abu Sa'id al-Khudri) said: And we returned and did not find any patch of cloud in the sky. Then the cloud gathered and there was (so heavy) a downpour that the roof of the mosque which was made of the branches of date-palms began to drip. Then there was prayer and I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prostrating in water and clay till I saw the traces of clay on his forehead.
[2629]
This badith has been reported on the authority of Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters (with a slight variation of these words): I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) after he had completed (the prayer) and there was a trace of clay on his forehead and tip (of the nose).
[2630]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed i'tikaf in the middle ten days of Ramadan to seek Lailat-ul-Qadr before it was made manifest to him. When (these nights) were over, he commanded to strike the tent. Then it was made manifest to him that (Lailat-ul-Qadr) was in the last ten nights (of Ramadan), and commanded to pitch the tent (again). He then came to the people and said: O people, Lailat-ul-Qadr was made manifest to me and I came out to inform you about it that two persons came contend- ing with each other and there was a devil along with them and I forgot it. So seek it in the last ten nights of Ramadan. Seek it on the ninth, on the seventh and on the fifth. I (one of the narrators) said: Abu Sa'id, you know more than us about numbers. He said: Yes, indeed we have better right than you. I said: What is this ninth, seventh, and fifth? He said: When twenty-one (nights are over) and the twenty-second begins, it is the ninth, and when twenty-three (nights) are over, that which follows (the last night) is the seventh, and when twenty-five nights are over, what follows it is fifth. Ibn Khallad said: Instead of the word Yahliqan (contending), he said Yakhtasiman, (they are disputing).
[2631]
'Abdullah b. Unais reported Allah's Messenger (may peace beupon him) as saying: I was shown Lailat-ul-Qadr; then I was made to forget it, and saw that I was prostrating in water and clay in the morning of that (night). He (the narrator) said: There was a downpour on the twenty-third night and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in prayer, and as he went back, there was a trace of water and clay on his forehead and on his nose. He (the narrator) said: 'Abdullah b. Unais used to say that it was the twenty-third (night).
[2632]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and Ibn Numair reported Allah's Mes- senger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Look for (and in the words of Waki, seek) Lailat-ul-Qadr in the last ten nights of Ramadan.
[2633]
Zirr b. Habaish reported: I thu asked Ubayy b. Ka'b (Allah be pleased with him): Your brother (in faith) Ibn Mas'ud says: He who stands (for the night prayer) throughout the year would find Lailat-ul-Qadr, whereupon he said: May Allah have mercy upon him; (he said these words) with the intention that people might not rely only (on one night), whereas he knew that it (Lailat-ul-Qadr) is in the month of Ramadan and it is the twenty-seventh night. He then took oath (without making any exception, i.e. without saying Innsha Allah) that it was the twenty-seventh night. I said to him: Abu Mundhir, on what ground do you say that? Thereupon he said: By the indication or by the sign which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave us, and that is that on that day (the sun) would rise without having any ray in it.
[2634]
Zirr b. Hubaish reported that Ubayy b. Ka'b (Allah be pleased with him) said about Lailat-ul-Qadr: By Allah, I know well about it. Shu'ba said: To the best of my knowledge it was the twenty-seventh night for which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to stand for prayer. Shu'ba doubted these words: That it was the night for which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to stand for prayer. And (he further) said: This was narrated to me by a friend of mine from him (the Holy Prophet).
[2635]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We were talking about Lailat-ul-Qadr in the presence of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: He who amongst you remembers (the night) when the moon arose and it was like a piece of plate (at the fag end of the month in a state of waning).
[2636]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe i'tikaf in the last ten days of Ramadan.
[2637]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe i'tikaf in the last ten days of Ramadan. Nafi' said: Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) showed me the place in the mosque where the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe i'tikaf.
[2638]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe i'tikaf in the last ten days of Ramadan.
[2639]
This hadith has been narrated by 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) through another chain of transmitters.
[2640]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) used to observe i'tikif in the last ten days of Ramadan till Allah called him back (to his heavenly home). Then his wives observed i'tikaf after him.
[2641]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) decided to observe i'tikaf, he prayed in the morning and then went to the place of his i'tikaf, and he commanded that a tent should be pitched for him, and it was pitched. He (once) decided to observe i'tikaf in the last ten days of Ramadan. Zainab (the wife of the Holy Prophet) commanded that a tent should be pitched for her. It was pitched accordingly. And some other wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) commanded that tents should be pitched for them too. And they were pitched. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) offered the morning prayer, he looked and found (so many) tents. Thereupon he said: What is this virtue that these (ladies) have decided to acquire? He commanded his tent to be struck and abandoned i'tikaf in the month of Ramadan and postponed it to the first ten days of Shawwal.
[2642]
This hadith has been reported through another chain of transmitters, and there it is mentioned that. 'A'isha, Hafsa and Zainab (Allah be pleased with them) pitched the tents for i'tikaf.
[2643]
'A'Isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that when the last ten nights began Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kept awake at night (for prayer and devotion), wakened his family, and prepared himself to observe prayer (with more vigour).
[2644]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to exert himself in devotion during the last ten nights to a greater extent than at any other time.
[2645]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I never saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) fasting in the ten days of Dhu'I-Hijja.
[2646]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not observe fast in the ten days of Dhul-Hijja.
[2647]
(Missing)
[2648]
Salim reported on the authority of his father ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked what a Muhrim should wear, whereupon he said: A Muhrim should not wear a shirt, or a turban, or a cap, or trousers, or a cloth touched with wars or with saffron, nor (should he wear) stock- ings, but in case he does not find shoes, but (before wearing stockings) be should trim them (in such a way) that these should become lower than the ankles.
[2649]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade the Muhrim to put on a cloth dyed in saffron or wars and he further said: One who does not find shoes (to wear) he way wear stockings, but (only) after trimming them below the ankles.
[2650]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say as he was delivering an address: So far as the trousers are concerned, one who does not find lower garment, he may wear them; as also socks, he may wear them who does not find shoes. It concerns the Muhrim.
[2651]
'Amr b. Dinar narrated with the same chain of transmitters that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) delivering sermon at 'Arafat, and he made a mention of this hadith (as quoted above).
[2652]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Amr b. Dinar with the same chain of transmitters, but none of them (the narrators) made a mention that he (the Holy Prophet) was delivering address at 'Arafia except Sbu'ba.
[2653]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who does not find shoes to wear may wear socks, and he who does not find lower garment to wear may put on trousers.
[2654]
Ya'la b. Umayya reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them) that a person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was at Ji'rana and he (the person) had been putting on a cloak which was perfumed, or he (the narrator) said: There was a trace of yellowness on it. He said (to the Holy Prophet): What do you command me to do during my Umra? (It was at this juncture) that the revelation came to the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him) and he was covered with a cloth, and Ya'la said: Would that I see revelation coming to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Would it please you to see the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) receiving the revelations 'Umar lifted a corner of the cloth and I looked at him and he was emitting a sound of snorting. He (the narrator) said: I thought it was the sound of a camel. When he was relieved of this he said: Where is he who asked about Umra? When the person came, the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Wash out the trace of yellowness, or he said: the trace of perfume and put off the cloak and do in your 'Umra what you do in your Hajj.
[2655]
Safwan b. Ya'la reported on the authority of his father (who said): A person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was staying at Ji'rana and I (the narrator's father) was at that time in the apostle's (may peace be upon him) company and (the person) was donning a cloak having the marks of perfume on it, and he said: I am in a state of Ihram for the sake of Umra, and it (this cloak) is upon me and I am perfumed. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: What would you do in your Hajj ? He said: I would take off the clothes and would wash from me this perfume. Thereupon the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: What you do in your Hajj do it in your Umra.
[2656]
Safwan b. Ya'la b. Umayya reported that Ya'la used to say to 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him): Would that I see revelation descending upon the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). (Once) when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in Ji'rana and there was a cloth which provided shade over him, and there were his Companions with him. 'Umar being one of them, there came a person with a cloak of wool on him daubed with perfume and he said: Messenger of Allah, what about the person who, entered upon the state of Ihram with a cloak after daub- ing it with perfume ? The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) looked at him for a short while, and then became quiet, and revelation began descending upon him, and 'Umar gestured (with his hand) to Ya'la b Umayya to come. Ya'la came and he enter- ed his head (beneath the cloth and saw) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) with his face red, and breathing with a snore. Then he felt relieved (of that burden) and he said: Where is the man who was just asking me about Umra ? The man was searched for and he was brought, and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: So far as the perfume is concerned, wash it three times, and remove the cloak too (as it was sewn) and do in 'Umra as you do in Hajj.
[2657]
Ya'la b. Umayya (Allah be pleased with him) reported that a person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was staying at Ji'rana and he had put on Ihram for 'Umra and he had dyed his beard and his head with yellow colour and there was a cloak on him. He said: I put on Ihram for 'Umra and I am in this state as you see (with dyed beard and head and a cloak over me). He (the Holy Prophet) said: Take off the cloak and wash the yellowness and do in your 'Umra what you do in Hajj.
[2658]
Ya'la reported: We were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that a person came to him with a cloak on him having the traces of scent. He said, Messenger of Allah, I put on Ihram for 'Umra: what should I do ? He (the Holy Prophet) kept quiet and did not make him any reply. And 'Umar screened him and it was (usual) with 'Umar that when the revelation descended upon him, he provided him shade (with the help of a piece of cloth). I (the person who came to the Holy Prophet) said: I said to 'Umar I wish to project my head into the cloth (to see how the Holy Prophet receives revelation). So when the revelation began to descend upon him 'Umar wrapped him (the Holy Prophet) with cloth I came to him and projected my head with him into the cloth, and saw him (the Holy Prophet) (receiving the revelation). When he (the Holy Prophet) was relieved (of its burden), he said: Where is the inquirer who was just inquiring about 'Umra? That man came to him. Thereupon he (the Apostle of Allah) said: Take off the cloak from (your body) and wash the traces of perfume which were upon you, and do in 'Umra what you did in Hajj.
[2659]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) specified Dhu'l-Hulaifa, for the people of Medina; Juhfa for the people of Syria; Qarn al-Manazil, for the people of Najd; Yalamlam for the people of Yemen (the Mawaqit) and those (Mawaqit) are also meant for those who live at these (places) and for those too who come from without towards them for the sake of Hajj or 'Umra. And those who live within them (within the bounds of these places) or in the suburbs of Mecca or within Mecca, they should enter upon the state of Ihram at these very places.
[2660]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) specified Dhu'l-Hulaifa for the people of Medina; Juhfa for the people of Syria, Qarn al-Manazil for the people of Najd, Yalamlam for the people of Yemen (as their respective Mawaqit), and he also said: These are (Mawaqit) of them too (who live there) and everyone who comes from outside (through) their (directions) for the sake of Hajj and 'Umra and for those who live within (those bounds their Miqat is that) from which they commenced (their journey), and for the people of Mecca, Mecca itself is (the Miqat).
[2661]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The people of Medina should enter upon the state of Ihram at Dhu'l-Hulaifa, and people of Syria at Juhfa, and people of Najd at Qarn (al-Manazil), and 'Abdullah (further) said: It has reached me that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also caid: The people of Yemen should enter upon the state of Ihram at Yalamlam.
[2662]
Salim reported on the authority of his father ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The people of Medina should enter upon the state of Ihram at Dhu'l-Hulaifa; the people of Syria at Juhfa, the people of Najd at Qarn (al-Manazil). Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: It was mentioned to me but I did not myself bear it (directly) from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) having said this: The people of Yemen should enter upon the state of Ihram at Yalamlam.
[2663]
Salim b. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with them) reported his father as saying: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying that the people of Medina should enter upon the state of Ihram at Dhu'l- Hulaifa, the people of Syria at Mahya'a and that is Juhfa, and the people of Najd at Qarn (al-Manazil). 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: (I did not hear it myself from him) but heard from them saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had (also) said: The people of Yemen should enter upon the state of Ihram at Yalamlam.
[2664]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had commanded the people of Medina to enter upon the state of Ihram at Dhu'l-Hulaifa; the people of Syria at Juhfa; the people of Najd at Qarn (al-Manazil). 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: I was informed that he said that the people of Yemen should enter upon the state of Ihram at Yalamlam.
[2665]
Abu Zubair reported that he heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) saying that as he was asked about (the places for entering upon the) state of ihram, he said: I heard (and he then carried the narration directly, I think to) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2666]
Abu Zubair heard Jabir b.'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) as saying as he was asked about (the place for entering upon the) state of Ihram: I heard (and I think he carried it directly to the Apostle of Allah) him saying: For the people of Medina Dhu'l-Hulaifa is the place for entering upon the state of Ihram, and for (the people coming through the other way, i.e. Syria) it is Juhfa; for the people of Iraq it is Dbat al-'Irq; for the people uf Najd it is Qarn (al-Manazil) and for the people of Yemen it is Yalamlam.
[2667]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Talbiya of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was this: Here I am at Thy service. O Allah, here I am at Thy service, here I am at Thy service. There is no associate with Thee; here I am at Thy service. Verily all praise and grace is due to Thee, and the sovereignty (too). There is no associate with Thee. He (the narrator) further said that 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) made this addition to it: Here I am at Thy service; here I am at Thy service; ready to obey Thee, and good is in Thy Hand; here I am at Thy service; unto Thee is the petition, and deed (is also for Thee).
[2668]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered upon the state of Ihram near the mosque at Dhu'l-Hulaifa as his camel stood by it and he said: Here I am at Thy service, O Lord; here I am at Thy service: here I am at Thy service. There is no associate with Thee. Here I am at Thy service. All praise and grace is due to Thee and the sovereignty (too). There is no associate with Thee. They (the people) said that 'Abdullah b. 'Umar said that that was the Talbiya of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Nafi' said: 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) made this addition to it: Here I am at Thy service; here I am at Thy service; ready to obey Thee. The Good is in Thy Hand. Here I am at Thy service. Unto Thee is the petition and deed (is also for Thee).
[2669]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I immediately learnt Talbiya from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he then narrated the hadith.
[2670]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya with compacted hair: Here I am at Thy service. O Allah: here I am at Thy service; here I am at Thy service. There is no associate with Thee; here I am at Thy service. Verily all praise and grace is due to Thee and the Sovereignty (too). There is no associate with Thee; and he did not make any addition to these words. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) (further) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to offer two rak'ahs of prayer at Dhu'l-Hulaifa and then when his camel stood up with him on its back near the mosque at Dhu'l-Hulaifa, he pronounced these words (of Talbiya). And 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased'with them) said that 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) pronounced, the Talbiya of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in these words of his (Prophet's words) and said: Here I am at Thy service, O Lord; here I am at Thy service, ready to obey Thee, and good is in Thy Hand, Here I am at Thy service. Unto Thee is the petition and deed (is also for Thee).
[2671]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the polytheists also pronounced (Talbiya) as: Here I am at Thy service, there is no associate with Thee. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Woe be upon them, as they also said: But one associate with Thee, you possess mastery over him, but he does not possess mastery (over you). They used to say this and circumambulate the Ka'ba.
[2672]
Salim b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he heard his father saying: This place Baida' is for you that about which you attribute lie to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). And the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not enter upon the state of Ihram but near the mosque at Dhu'l- Hulaifa.
[2673]
Salim reported that when it was said to Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that the state of Ihram (commences from) al-Baida' he said: Al-Baida', you attribute lie about it to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). And the Messenger of Allah (mav peace be upon him) did not enter upon the state of Ihram but near the-tree when his camel stood up with him.
[2674]
'Ubaid b. Juraij said to 'Ahdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them): 'Abd al-Rahman, I find you doing four things which I do not see anyone among your companions doing. He said: Son of Juraij, what are these? Thereupon he said: You (while circumambulating the Ka'ba) do not touch but the two pillars situated on the side of yaman (south), and I find you wearing the sandals of tanned leather, and I find you with dyed beard and head, and I also found that, when you were at Mecca, the people pronounced Talbiya as they saw the new moon (Dhu'l-Hijja), but you did not do it till the 8th of Dhu'l-Hijja. Upon this 'Abdullab b. 'Umar said: (So far as the touching of) the pillars is concerned, I did not see the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) touching them but only those situated on the side of yaman. (So far asthe wearing of) the shoes of tanned leather is concerned, I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) wearing shoes without hair on them, and he (wore them with wet feet) after performing ablution, and I like to wear them. So far as the yellowness is concerned, I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) dyeing (head, beard and cloth)with this colour and I love to dye (my head, beard or cloth) with this colour. And so far as the pronouncing of Talbiya is concerned, I did not see the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronouncing it until his camel proceeded on (to Dhu'l-Hulaifa).
[2675]
'Ubaid b. Juraij reported: I remained in the company of 'Abdullah b. 'Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with them) its twelve Hajjs and 'Umras and I said to him: I saw four characteristics (peculiar in you), and the rest of the hadith is the same except the case of Talbiya. There he offered the narration given by al-Maqburi and he stated the facts excepting the one given above.
[2676]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced Talbiya in Dhu'l-Hulaifa as he put his feet in the stirrup and his camel stood up and proceeded.
[2677]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced Talbiya as his camel stood up.
[2678]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) riding on his camel at Dhu'l-Hulaifa and pronouncing Talbiya as it stood up with him.
[2679]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) spent the night at Dhu'l-Hulaifa while com- mencing (the rites of) Pilgrimage and he observed prayer in the mosque.
[2680]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I applied perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) before he entered upon the state of lhram and (concluding) before circumambulating the (sacred) House.
[2681]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her), the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported: I applied perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with my own hand before he entered upon the state of Ihram, and as he concluded it before-circumambulating the House (for Tawaf-i-lfada).
[2682]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I used to apply perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) before his entering upon the state of Ihram and at the conclusion of it, before circumambulating the House (for Tawf-i- Ifada).
[2683]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: I applied perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he became free from Ihram and as he entered upon it.
[2684]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: I applied perfume of Dharira to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with my hand (on the occasion of) the Farewell Pilgrimage on freeing from the state of Ihram and entering upon it.
[2685]
'Uthman b. 'Urwa reported on the authority of his father that he said: I asked 'A'isha with what thing she perfumed the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at the time of entering upon the state of Ihram. She said: With the best of perfume.
[2686]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I applied the best perfume, which I could get, to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) before entering upon the state of Ihram (and after this) he put on the Ihram.
[2687]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I applied the best available perfume I could find to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) before he entered upon the state of Ihram and after he was free from it.
[2688]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I still seem to see the glisten- ing of the perfume where the hair parted on Allah's Messenger's (may peace be upon him) head as he was in the state of Ihram, and Khalaf (one of the narrators) did not say: As he was in the state of Ihram, but said: That was the perfume of Ihram.
[2689]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I still seem to see the glisten- ing of the perfume where the hair parted on Allah's Messenger's (may peace be upon him) head and he was free from Ihram.
[2690]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I still seem to see the glisten- ing of the perfume where the hair parted on Allah's Messenger's (may peace be upon him) head, while he was pronouncing Talbiya.
[2691]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I still seem to see; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[2692]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: I still seem to see the glistening of the perfume where the hair was parted on Allah's Messeinger's (may peace be upon him) head while he was in the state of Ihram.
[2693]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I still seem to perceive the glistening of perfume where the hair was parted on Allah's Messenger's (may peace be upon him) head as he was in the state of Ihram.
[2694]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) intended to enter upon the state of Ihram he perfumed himself with the best of perfumes which he could find and after that I saw the glisten- ing of oil on his head and beard.
[2695]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I still seem to see the glisten- ing of musk (in the parting of the head) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) while he was in the state of Ihram.
[2696]
This hadith has been narrated by 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of trans- mitters.
[2697]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I used to perfume the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) with a perfume containing musk before entering upon the state of Ihram and on the day of sacrifice (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja) and (at the conclusion of Ihram) before circumambulating the House (for Tawaf-i-Ifada).
[2698]
Muhammad b. al-Muntashir reported on the authority of his father: I asked 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) about a person who applied perfume and then (on the following) morning entered upon the state of lhram. There- upon he said: I do not like to enter upon the state of Ihram shaking off the perfume. Rubbing of tar (upon my body) is dearer to me than doing this (i.e. the applying of perfume), I went to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and told her that Ibn 'Umar stated: "I do not like to enter upon the state of Ihram shaking off the perfume. Rubbing of tar (upon my body) is dearer to me than doing it (the applying of perfume)." Thereupon 'A'isha said: I applied perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at the time of his entering upon the state of Ihram. He then went round his wives and then put on Ihram in the morning.
[2699]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I used to apply perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He then went round his wives, and entered upon the state of Ihram in the morning and the perfume was shaken off.
[2700]
Muhammad b. al-Muntashir reported on the authority of his father: I heard from Ibn 'mar having said this: "It is dearer to me to rub tar (on my body) than to enter upon the state of Ihram (in a state) of shaking off the perfume." He (the narrator) said: I went to 'A'isha and told her about this statement of his (of Ibn 'Umar). Thereupon she said: I applied perfume to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he then went round his wives and then entered upon the state of Ihram in the morning.
[2701]
Al-Sa'b b. Jaththama al-Laithi reported that he presented a wild ass to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) when he was at al-Abwa', or Waddan, and he refused to accept it. He (the narrator) said: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) looked into my face (which had the mark of dejection as my present had been rejected by him) he (in order to console me) said: We have refused it only because we are in a state of Ihram.
[2702]
A hadith (pertaining to this topic),has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri (and the words are): "I presented to him (the Holy Prophet) a wild ass."
[2703]
It is narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters (the narrator having) said this: "I presented to him the flesh of a wild ass."
[2704]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that al-Sa'b b. Jaththama presented to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) a wild ass as he was in a state of Ihram, and he returned it to him saying: If we were not in a state of Ihram, we would have accepted it from you.
[2705]
The narration transmitted by Hakam (the words are): Al-Sa'b b. Jaththama presented to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) the leg of a wild ass. And in the narration transmitted by Shu'ba (the words are) : (He presented to him) the rump of a wild ass as the blood was trickling from it. In the narration transmitted by Shu'ba on the authority of Habib (the words are) : A part of a wild ass was presented to the Apostle (may peace he upon him) and he returned it to him (who presented it).
[2706]
Tawus reported on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) that one Zaid b. Arqamwent to him (Ibn 'Abbas) and said : Narrate how you informed me about the meat of the game presented to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was in the state of Ihram. Thereupon he said: He was pre- sented with a slice of the meat of game, but he returned it to him (who presented it) saying : We are not going to eat it, as we are in the state of Ihram.
[2707]
Abu Qatada reported: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) till we reached al-Qaha (a place three stages away from Medina). Some of us were in the state of Ihram and some of us were not. I saw my companions looking towards something, and as I saw I found It to be a wild ass. I saddled my horse and took up my spear and then mounted upon (the horse) and my whip, fell down. I said to my companions as they were in the state of Ihram to pick up the whip for me but they said : By Allah, we cannot help you in any (such) thing (i.e. hunting). So i dis- mounted (the horse) and picked it (whip) up and mounted again and caught the wild ass after chasing it. It was behind a hillock and I attacked it with my spear and killed it. Then I brought it to my companions. Some of them said : Eat it, while others said: Do not eat it. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in front of us. I moved my horse and came to him (and asked him), whereupon he said: It is permis- sible, so eat it.
[2708]
Abu Qatada (Allah be pleased with him) reported that while he was with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on one of the highways of Mecca, he lagged behind him (the Holy Prophet) along with companions who were in the state of Ihram, whereas he was himself not Muhrim. He saw a wild ass. As he was mounting his horse he asked his companions to pick up for him his whip (which had dropped) but they refused to do so. He asked them to hand him over the spear, but they refused. He then himself took hold of it and chased the wild ass and killed it. Some of the Companions of the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him) ate (its meat), but some of them refused to do so. They overtook the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and asked him about it, and he said: It is a food which Allah provided you (so eat it).
[2709]
This hadith pertaining to the wild ass is reported on the authority of Abu Qatada. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this (variation of words) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "Is there with you some of its flesh?"
[2710]
'Abdullah b. Abu Qatada reported: My father went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the year of Hudaibiya. His Companions entered upon the state of Ihram whereas he did not, for it was conveyed to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that the enemy (was hiding at) Ghaiqa. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went forward. He (Abu Qatada) said: Meanwhile I was along with his Companions, some of them smiled (to one another) As I cast a glance I saw a wild ass. I attacked It with a spear and held it, and begged for their (i.e. of his companions) assistance, but they refused to help me and we ate its meat. But we were afraid lest we should be separated (from the Messenger of Allah). So I proceeded on (with a view to) seeking the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Some- times I'dashed my horse and sometimes I made it run at a leisurely pace (keeping pace with others). (In the meanwhile) I met a person from Banfu Ghifar in the middle of the night. I said to him: Where did you meet the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ? He said: I left him at Ta'bin and he intended to halt at Suqya to spend the afternoon. I met him and said: Messenger of Allah. your Companions convey salutations and benedictions of Allah to you and they fear that they may not be separated from you (and the enemy may do harm to you), so wait for them, and he (the Holy Prophet) waited for them. I said: Messenger of Allah, I killed a game and there is left with me (some of the meat). The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to his people: Eat it. And they were in the state of Ihram.
[2711]
'Abdullah b. Abo. Qatada reported on the ant 'hority of his father (Allah be pleased with him): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) set out for Pil- grimage and we also set out along with him. He (Abu Qatada) said: There proceeded on some of his Companions and Abu Qatada was (one of them). He,(the Holy Prophet) said: You proceed along the coastline till you meet me. He (Abfl Qatida) said: So they proceeded ahead of the Prophet of God (may peace be upon him), all of them had entered upon the state of Ihram, except Abu Qatada; he had not put on ]hram. As they went on they saw a wild ass, and Abu Qatada attacked it and cut off its hind legs. They got down and ate its meat. They said: We ate meat In the state of Ihram. They carried the meat that was left of it. As they came to the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) they said: Messenger of Allah, we were in the state of Ibrim where as Abu Qatada was not. We saw a wild ass and Abu Qatada attacked it and cut off its hind legs. We got down and ate its meat and we thus ate the meat of a game while we were In the state of Ihram. We have (carried to you) what was left out of its meat. There upon he (the holy Prophet) said: Did anyone among you command him (to hunt) or point to him with anythiny (to do so) ? They said: No. There upon he said: Then eat what is left out of its meat.
[2712]
This hadith is narrated'on the authority of 'Uthman b. 'Abdullah b. Mauhab with the same chain of transmitters. And in the narration transmitted on the authority of Shaiban (the words are): "The Messenoer of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Did any one of you command him to attack it or point towards it ?" And in the narration transmitted by Shu'ba (the words are) : "Did you point out or did you help or did you hunt ?" Shu'ba said: I do not know whether he said: "Did you help or did you hunt?"
[2713]
Abdullah b. Abu Qatada narrated on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that they went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on an expedition to Hudaibiya. He (further) said: They had entered upon the state of Ihram except I for 'Umra. He (again) said: I (Abu Qatada) hunted a wild ass and fed my companions In the state of their being Muhrim. I then came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and informed him that we had with us the meat that was left out of it Thereupon he said: Eat It, while they were in the state of Ibrim.
[2714]
'Abdullah b. Abu Qatada reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that they went out with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and they were Muhrim except Abu Qatada. The rest of the hadith Is the same (but with the exception of these words): "He (the Holy Prophet) said: 15 there any- thing out of it? They said: We have its leg with us. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took it and ate it."
[2715]
Abdullah b. Abi Qatada reported that Abu Qatada was among the party of those who had entered upon the state of Ihram whereas he was not. The rest of the hadith is the same (and herein it is also narrated): "He (the Holy Prophet) said: Did any person among you point to him (to hunt) or command him (in any form)? They said: Messenger of Allah, not at all. Thereupon he said: Then eat it."
[2716]
Abd al-Rahman b. 'Uthman Taimi reported on the authority of his father; While we were with Talha b. Ubaidullah and were in the state of Ihram we were pre- sented a (cooked) bird. Talha was sleeping. Some of us ate it and some of us refrained from (eating) it. When Talba awoke he agreed,with him who ate it, and said: We ate it along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2717]
A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Four are the vicious (birds, beasts and reptiles) which should be killed in the state of Ihram or otherwise: kite (and vulture), crow, rat, and the voracious dog I (one of the narrators, 'Ubaid- ullah b. Miqsam) said to Qasim (the other narrator who beard it from 'A'isha): What about the snake? lie said: Let it be killed with disgrace.
[2718]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah'* Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five are the harmful things which should be killed in the state of Ihram or otherwise: snake, speckled crow. rat. voracious dog, and kite.
[2719]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five are the vicious beasts which should be killed even in the state of Ihram: scorpion, rat, kite, crow and voracious dog.
[2720]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[2721]
A'isha reported Allah's Mdssenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: Five are the vicious and harmful things which should be killed even within the precincts of Haram: rat, scorpion, crow. kite and voracious dog.
[2722]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters that she (A'isha) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded to kill five harmful things in the state of lhram or other- wise. The rest of the badith is the same.
[2723]
IA'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five are the beasts 1618 harmful and vicious and these must be killed even within the precincts of the Ka'ba : crow, kite, voracio@s dog, kcorpion and rat.
[2724]
Salim reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Five are the (beasts) which if one kills them in the precincts of the Ka'ba or in the state of lhram entail no sin: rat, scorpion, crow, kite and voracious dog. In another version the words are : "as a Muhrim and in the state of lhram".
[2725]
Hafsa, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this : There are five beasts, all of them are vicious and harmful and there is no tin for one who kills them (and these are): scorpion, crow. kite, rat and voracious dog.
[2726]
Zaid b. Jubair reported: A person asked Ibn Umar which beast a Muhrim could kill. Thereupon he said: One of the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) told me: He (the Holy Prophet) commanded to kill rat, scorpion, kite, voracious dog and crow.
[2727]
Zaid b. Jubair reported: A person asked Ibn 'Umar which beast a Mubrim could kill, whereupon he said: One of the wives of Allab's Apostle (may peace be upon him) told me: He (the Holy Prophet) commanded to kill voracious dcg, rat, scorpion, kite, crow, and snake (and this is allowed) likewise in prayer.
[2728]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five are the beasts for killing which there is no sin for the Muhrim : crow, kite, 5corpiou, rat and voracious dog.
[2729]
Ibn Juraij reported: I said to Nafi: What is that which you heard Ibn ,Umar declaring permissible for a Mubrim to kill some of the beasts? Nafi, said to me that 'Abdullah had reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five are the beasts in killing which or their being killed, there is no sin: crow, kite, scorpion, rat and voracious dog.
[2730]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through be upon him) as saying: Five (are the beasts) in killing which or their being killed in the precinct of the Ka'ba there is no sin." The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2731]
'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messen- ger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five (are the animals) which, it one kills them In the state of Ihram, entail no sin for one (who does it) : scorpion, rat, voracious dog, crow and kite.
[2732]
Ka'b b. 'Ujra (Allah be pleased with him) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me on the occasion of Hudaibiya and I was kindling fire under my cooking pot and lice were creeping on my face. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Do the vermins harm your head ? I said: Yes. He said: Get your head shaved and (in lieu of it) observe fasts for three days or feed six needy persons, or offer sacrifice (of an animal). Ayyub said: I do not know with what (type of expiation) did he commence (the statement).
[2733]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Ayyub.
[2734]
Kalb b. Ujra (Allah be pleased with him) reported: It was I for whom this verse was revealed (to the Holy Prophet): "Whoever among you is sick or has an ail- ment of the head, he (may effect) a compensation by lasting or alms or a sacrifice" He said: I came to him (the Holy Prophet) and he said: Come Dear. So Iwent near. He (again) said: Come near. So I went near. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do the vermins trouble you? Ibn Aun (one of the narrators) said: I think he (Ka'b b. Ujra) replied in the affirmative. He (the Holy Prophet) then commanded to do compensation by fasting or by giving @adaqa (feed- ing six needy persons) or by sacrifice (of a animal) that is available.
[2735]
Ka'b b. 'Ujra (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be, upon him) stood near him and lice were falling from his head. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Do these vermins trouble you? I said: Yes. Thereupon he said: Then shave your head; and it was in connection with me that this verse was revealed: "Whoever among you is sick or has an ailment of the head, he (may effect) a compensation by fasting or alms or a sacrifice" . He (the Holy Prophet, therefore) said to me: Observe fast for three days or give a quantity of alms enough to feed six needy persons or offer sacrifice (of an animal) that is available.
[2736]
Ka'b b. 'Ujra (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by him at Hudaibiya before entering Mecca in a state of Ibrim and he (Ka'b) was kindling fire under the cooking pot and virmins were creeping on his (Kalb's) face. Thereupon (the Holy Prophet) said:Dothese vermins trouble you? He (Ka'b) said: Yes. The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: Shave your head and give some quantity of food enough to feed six needy persons (faraq is equal to three sa's), or observe fast for three days or offer sacri- fice of a sacrificial animal. Ibn Najih (one of the narrators) said: "Or sacrifice a goat."
[2737]
Ka'b b. Ujra (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by him during the period of Hudaibiya. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said to him (Ka'b b. Ujra): Do these vermins trouble your head? He said: Yes. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Shave your head. Then sacrifice a goat or observe fasts for three days or give three sits of dates to feed six needy persons.
[2738]
Abdullah b. Ma'qil said: I sat with Ka'b (Allah be pleased with him) and he was in the mosque. I asked him about this verse: "Compensation in (the form of) fasting, or Sadaqa or sacrifice." Ka'b (Allah be pleased with him) said: It was reveal- ed In my case. There was some trouble in my head. I was taken to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and lice were creeping upon my face. Thereupon he said: I did not think that your trouble had become so unbearable as I see. Would you be able to afford (the sacrificing) of a goat? I (Ka'b) said: Then this verse was revealed: "Com- pensation (in the form of) fasting or alms or a sacrifice." He (the Holy Prophet) said: (It Implies) fasting for three days, or feeding six needy perscins, half sa' of food for every needy person. This verse was revealed particularly for me and (now) Its applica- tion is general for all of you.
[2739]
Ka'b b. Ujra (Allah be pleased with him) reported that he went out with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the state of Ihram, and his (Ka'b's) head and beard were infested with lice. This was conveyed to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). He sent for him (Ka'b) and called a barber (who) shaved his head. He (the Holy Prophet) said. Is there any sacrificial animal with you? He (Kalb) said: I cannot afford it. He then commanded him to observe fasts for three days or feed six needy persons, one sa' for every two needy persons. And Allah the Exalted and Majestic revealed this (verse) particular with regard to him: "So whosoever among you is sick and has an ailment of the head . . "; then (its application) became general for the Muslims.
[2740]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) got himself cupped in the state of lhrim.
[2741]
Ibn Buhaina reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) got himself cupped in the middle of his head on his way to Mecca.
[2742]
Nubaih b. Wabb reported: We went with Aban b. Uthman (in a state of lhram). When we were at Malal the eyes of Umar b. Ubaidullah became sore and, when we reached Rauba' the pain grew intense. He (Nubaib b. Wahb) sent (one) to Aban b. Uthman to ask him (what to do). He sent him (the message) to apply aloes to them, for 'Uthman (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) applied aloes to the person whose eyes were sore and he was in the state of Ihram.
[2743]
Nubaih b Wahb reported that the eyes of Umar b. Ubaidnllah b. Ma'mar were swollen, and he decided to use antimony. Aban b. 'Uthman forbade him to do so and commanded him to apply aloes on them, and reported on the authority of 'Uthman b. Affan that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had done that.
[2744]
Ibrahim b. 'Abdullah narrated on the authorrity of his father that there cropped up a difference of opinion between Abdullah b. 'Abbas and al-Miswar b. Makhrama at a place (called) Abwa'. Abdullah b. 'Abbas contended that a Muhrim (is permitted) to wash his head, whereas Miswar contended that a Muhrim is not (permit- fed) to wash his head. So Ibn Abbas sent me (the father of Ibrabim) to Abu Ayyub al- Ansirl to ask him about it. (So I went to him) and found him taking bath behind two poles covered by a cloth. I gave him salutation, whereupon be asked: Who is this? I said: I am 'Abdullah b. Hunain. 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas has sent me to you to find out how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) washed his head in the state of Ihram. Abu Ayyub (Allah be pleased with him) placed his hand on the cloth and lowered it (a little) till his head became visible to me; and he said to the man who was pouring water upon him to pour water. He poured water on his head. He then moved his head with the help of his hands and moved them (the hands) forward and backward and then said: This is how I saw him (the Messenger of Allah) doing.
[2745]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters that Abu Ayyub rubbed his whole head with his hands and then moved them forward and backward. Miswar said to Ibn 'Abbas: I would never dispute with you (in future).
[2746]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that a person fell down from his camel (in a state of Ihram) and his neck was broken and he died. Thereupon Allah's Apostle.(may peace be upon him) said: Bathe him with water mixed with the leaves of the lote tree and shroud him in his two (pieces of) cloth (Ihbram), and do not cover his head for Allah will raise him on the Day of Resurrection Pronouncing Talbiya.
[2747]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: While a person was standing in 'Arafat with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) he fell down from his camel and broke his neck. This was mentioned to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Bathe him with water mixed with the leaves of the lote tree and shroud him in two (pieces of) cloth and neither perfume him nor cover his head; (Ayyub said) for Allah would raise him on the Day of Resurrection in the state of pronouncing Talbiya. ('Amr. however, said): Verily Allah would raise him on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya. Sa'id b. Jubair narrated this hadith on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) that a person was standing with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was in the state of Ihram. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2748]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that a person proceeded along with the Apostle of Allah (may peace he upon him) in the state of Ihram and fell down from his camel and his neck was broken, and he died. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Bathe him with water mixed with lote (leaves) and shroud him in two (pieces of) cloth and do'not cover his head for he would come on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya.
[2749]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported on the authority of Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) that a person proceeded with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the state of Ihram. The rest of the hadith th is the same except that he (the Holy Prophet) (is reported to have) said: He would be raised on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya. Sa'id b. Jubair did not name the place where he fell down.
[2750]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that there was a person in the state of Ihram whose camel broke his neck and he died. Thereupon the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Bathe him with water mixed (with the leaves of) lote tree and shroud him In his two (pieces of) cloth and cover neither his head nor his face, for he would be raised on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya.
[2751]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that when a person who was in the state of Ihram was in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), his camel broke his neckand he died. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Bathe him with water (mixed with the leaves) of the lute tree and shroud him in his two (pieces of) cloth and, neither perfume him nor cover his head, for he would be raised on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya.
[2752]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) that a camel broke the neck of its owner while he was in the state of lhram and he was at that time in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that he should be bathed with water mixed with (leaves of the) lote (tree) and no perfume should be applied to him and his head should not be covered, for he would be raised on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talblya.
[2753]
Sa'id b. Jubair heard Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) as saying: A person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) while he was in the state of lhram. He fell down from his camel and broke his neck. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) commanded to bathe him with water (mixed with the leaves of) the lote (tree), and shroud him in two (pieces of) cloth and not to apply perfume (to him), keeping his head out (of the shroud). Shu'ba said: He then narrated to me after this (the words) "keeping his head out," his face out, for he would be raised on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya.
[2754]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) that the camel of a person broke his neck as he was in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The Messenger of Allah, (way peace be upon him) commanded them (Companions) to wash him with water mixed (with the leaves of) the lote (tree) and to keep his face exposed; (he, the narrator) said: And his head (too), for he would be raised on the Day of Resurrection pronouncing Talbiya.
[2755]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that there was a person in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace' be upon him) whose camel broke his neck and he died. thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Wash him, but do not apply perfume and do not cover his face, for he would be raised (on the Day of Resurrection) pronouncing Talbiya.
[2756]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went (into the house of) Duba'a bint Zubair and said to her: Did you intend to perform Hajj? She said: By Allah, (I intend to do so) but I often remain ill, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said to her: Perform Hajj but with con- dition, and say:O Allah, I shall be free from Ihram where you detain me. And she (Duba'a) was the wife of Miqdad.
[2757]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) went (to the house of) Duba'a bint al-Zubair b. Abd al-Muttalib. She said: Messenger of Allah, I intend to perform Hajj, but I am ill. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Enter Into the state of Ihram on condition that you would abandon it when Allah would detain you.
[2758]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'isha through another chain of transmitters.
[2759]
Ibn Abbas reported that Duba'a bint al-Zubair b. 'Abd al-Muttalib (Allah be pleased with her) came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I am an ailing woman but I intend to perform Hajj; what you command me (to do)? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Enter into the state of Ihram (uttering these words) of condition: I would be free from it when Thou wouldst detain me.'He (the narrator) said: But she was able to complete (the Hajj without breaking down).
[2760]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Duba'a intended to perform Hajj. and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded her (to enter into the state of Ihram) with condition. She did it in compliance with the com- mand of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[2761]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas with a slight variation of words.
[2762]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Asma' hint 'Umais gave birth to Muhammad b Abu Bakr near Dhu'I-Hulaifa. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded Abu Bakr to convey to her that she should take a bath and then enter into the state of Ihram.
[2763]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that when Asma' hint Umais gave birth (to a child) in Dhu'I-Hulaifa. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded Abyl Bakr (to convey to her) that she should take a bath and enter Into the state of Ihram.
[2764]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the year of the Farewell Pilgrimage. We entered into the state of Ibrim for Umra. Then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who has the sacrificial animal with him, he should put on Ihram for Hajj along with Umra. and should not put it off till he has completed them (both Hajj and Umra). She said: When I came to Mecca. I was having menses, I neither circumambulated the House, nor ran between as-safa' and al-Marwa. I complained about it to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: Undo your hair,comb it, and pronounce Talbiya for Hajj, and give up Umra (for the time being), which I did. When we had performed the Hajj, the Messenger of Allah (way peace he upon him) sent me with Abd al-Rabman b. Abu Bakr to Tan'im saying: This is the place for your Umra. Those who had put on Ibrim for Umra circumambulated the House, and ran between al-safa' and al-Marwa. They then put off Ihram and then made the last circuit after they had returned from Mina after performing their Hajj, but those who had combined the Hajj and the Umra made only one circuit (as they had combined Hajj and 'Umra).
[2765]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: We went out with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the year of the Farewell Pilgrimage. There were some amongst us who had put on IHram for Umra and there were some who had put on Ihram for Hajj. (We proceeded on till) we came to Mecca. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who put on Ihram for 'Umra but did not bring the sacrificial animal with him should put it off. and he who put on Ihram for Umra and he who had brought the sacrificial animal with him should not put it off until he had slaughtered the animal; and he who put on lhram for Hajj should complete it. A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: I was in the monthlyperiod, and I remained In this state till the day of 'Arafa, and I had entered into the state of Ihram for 'Umra. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) thus commanded me to undo my hair and comb them (again) and enter into the state of Ihram for Hajj, and abandon (the rites of 'Umra). She ('A'isha) said: I did so, and when I had completed my Pilgrimage, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent with me 'Abd al-Rabman b. Abu Bakr and commanded me to (resume the rites of) 'Umra at Tan'im. the place where (I abandoned) 'Umra and put on Ihram for Hajj (before completing Umra).
[2766]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the year of the Farewell Pilgrimage. I put on Ihram for Umra and did not bring the sacrificial animal. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who has the sacrihcial animal with him should enter into the state of Ibrim for Hajj along with 'Umra, and. he should not put the Ibrim off till he has completed both of them. She (Hadrat A'isha) said: The monthly period began. When it was the nigt of Arafa,I said to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): I entered into the state of Ihram for 'Umra. but now how should I perform the Hajj? Thereupon he said: Undo your hair and comb them, and desist from performing Umra, and put on Ihram for Hajj She (A'isha, said: When I had completed my Hajj he commanded 'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr to carry me behind him (on boneback) in order to enable me to resume the rituals of Umra from Tan'im, the place where I abandoned its rituals.
[2767]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: 'We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (to Mecca). He said: He who intended among you to put on Ihram for Hajj and Umra should do so. And he who intended to put on Ihram for Hajj may do so. and he who intended to put on Ihram for 'Umra only may do so. A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) put on Ihram for Hajj and some people did that along with him. And some people put on Ihram for Umra and Hajj (both). and some persons put on Ihram for Umra only, and I was among those who put on Ihram for Umra (only).
[2768]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him? (in his) Farewell Pilgrimage near the time of the appearance of the new moon of Dhu'I-Hijja. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who amongst you intends to put on Ihram for Umra may do so; bad I not brought sacrificial animal along with me, I would have put on Ihram for Umra. She (further said). There were some persons who put on Ihram for Umrs, and some persons who put on Ibrim for gajj, and I was one of those who put on Ihram for Umra. We went on till we reached Mecca, and on the day of 'Arafa I found myself In a state of menses, but I did not put off the Ihram for Umra. I told about (this state of mine) to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). whereupon he said: Abandon your 'Umra, and undo the hair of your head and comb (them), and put on Ihram for Hajj 'she('A'isha)said:I did accordingly.When it was the night at Hasba and Allah enabled us to complete our Hajj, he (the Holy Prophet) sent with me Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr, and he mounted me behind him on his camel and took me to Tan'im and I put on Ihram for 'Umra, and thus Allah enabled us to complete our Hajj and Umra and (we wore required to observe) neither sacrifice nor alms nor fasting.
[2769]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: We set out with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) just at the appearance of the new moon of Dhu'l- Hijja. We had no other intention but that of performing the Hajj, whereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who among you intends to put on Ihram for 'Umra should do so for 'Umra. The rest of the badith is the same.
[2770]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at the appearance of the new moon of Dhu'I-Hijja. There were amongst us those who had put on Ihram for Umra, and those also who had put on Ihram both for Hajj and Umra, and still those who had put on Ihram for Hajj (alone). I was one of those who had put on Ihram for . Umra (only). 'Urwa (one of the narrators) said: Allah enabled her (Hdrat A'isha) to complete both Hajj and Umra (according to the way as mentioned above). Hisham (one of the narrators) said: She had neither the sacrificial animal nor (was she required to) fast, nor (was she obliged to give) alms.
[2771]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: We proceeded with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the year of the Farewell Pilgrimage. There were those amongst us who had put on Ihram for Umra, and those who had put on Ibrim both for Hajj and "Umra, and those amongst us who had put on Ihram for Hajj (only), while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had put on Ihram for Hajj (only). He who put on Ihrim for Umra put it off (after performing #Umra), and he who had put on Ihram for Hajj or for both Hajj and 'Umra did not put it off before the day of sacrifice (10th of Dhu'I-Hijja).
[2772]
A'isba (Allah be pleased with her) said: We proceeded with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) with no other Intention but that of performing the Hajj. As I was at Sarif or near it, I entered in the state of menses. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me and I was weeping, whereupon he said: Are you in a state of menses? I said. Yes. whereupon he said: This is what Allah has ordained for all the daughters, of Adam. Do whatever the pilgrim does. except that you should not circumambulate the House till you have washed yourself (at the end of the menses period). And the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered sacrifice of a cow on behalf of his wives.
[2773]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with no other aim but that of Hajj till we came (to the place known as) Sarif; and there I entered in the state of menses. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me while I was weeping. He said: What makes you weep? I said: Would that I had not come (for Pilgrimage) this year. He (the Holy Prophet) said: What has happened to you? You have perhaps entered the period of menses. I said: Yes. He said: This is what has been ordained for the daughters of Adam. Do what a pilgrim does except that you should not circumambu- late the House, till you are purified (of the menses). She ('A'isha) said: When I came to Mecca, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to his companions: Make this (Ihram) the Ihram for 'Umra. So the people put off Ihbaim except those who had sacrificial animals with them. She ('A'isha) said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had the sacrificial animal with him, and so had Abd Bakr, 'Umar and other persons of means. They (those who had put off lhram again) put on Ihram (for Hajj) when they marched (towards Mina), and it was the 8th of Dhu'I-Hijja. She ('A'isha) said: When it was the day of sacrifice (10th of Dhu'I-Hijia), I was purified, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded me and I did the circuthambulation of Ifada. She said that the flesh of cow was sent to us. I said: What is It? They said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has offered cow as sacrifice on behalf of his wives. When it was the might at Hasba, I said: Messenger of Allah, people are coming back from Hajj and Umra, where as I am coming back from Hajj (alone). She (IA'isha) reported: He (the Holy Prophet) commanded "Abd al- Rahman b. Abu Bakr to mount me upon his camel behind him. She ('A'isha) said: I was very young and I well remember that I dozed oil and my face touched the bind part of the haudaj (camel litter) till we came to Tan'im, and entered into the state of Ihram in lieu of Umra (which I for the time being abandoned) and which the people had performed.
[2774]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We entered into the state of. Ihram for Hajj till we were at Sarif and I was in menses. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me and I was weeping. The rest of the hadith is the same but (with this portion) that there were sacrificial animals with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and with Abu Bakr, Umar and with rich persons. And they pro- nounced Talbiya as they proceeded on. And there is no mention of this (too): "I was a girl of tender age and I dozed off and my face touched the bind part of the Haudaj."
[2775]
'A'Isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered into the state of Ihram for Hajj Ifrid.
[2776]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We proceeded with the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) putting on the Ihram for Hajj during the months of Hajj and the night of Hajj till we encamped at Sarlf. He (the Holy Prophet) went to his Companiens and said: He who has no sacrificial animal with him, in his case I wish that he should perform Umra (with this Ihram), and he who has the sacrificial animal with him should not do it. So some of thtm performed Hajj whereas others who had no sacrificial animals with them did not do (Hajj, but per- formed only 'Umra). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had the sacrificial animal with him and those too who could afford it (performed) Hajj). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me (i.e. A'isha) while I was weeping, and he said: What makes thee weep? I said: I heard your talk with Companions about Umra. He said: What has happened to you? I said: I do not observe prayer (due to the monthly period), whereupon besaid: It would not harm you; you should perform (during this time) the rituals of Hajj (which you can do outside the House). Maybe Allah will compensate you for this. You are one among the daughters of Adam and Allah has ordained for you as He has ordained for them. So I proceeded on (with the rituals of Hajj) till we came to Mina. I washed myself and then circumambuleted the House, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) encamped at Muhassab and called ,Abd al-Rahman b. Abua Bakr. and said: Take out your sister from the precincts of the Ka'ba in order to put on Ihram for Umra and circumambulate the House. and I shall wait for you here. She said: So I went out and put on Ihram and then circu- mambulated the House. and (ran) between al-Safa and al-Marwa, and then we came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was in his bouse in the middle of the night. He said: Have you completed your (rituals)? I said: Yes. He then announced to his Companions to march on. He came out, and went to the House and circumambulated it before the dawn prayer and then proceeded to Medina.
[2777]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: Some among us put on Ihram for Hajj alone (Hajj Mufrad); some of us for Hajj and Umra together (Qiran), and some of us for Tamattal (first for Umra and after completing it for Haii).
[2778]
AI-Qasim b. Muhammad reported that A'isha had come for Hajj.
[2779]
'Umra reported: I heard A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) as saying: We went out with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) five days before the end of Dhi Qa'dah, and we did see but that he intended to perform Hajj (only), but as we came near Mecca the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded that he who did not have the sacrificial animal with him should put off Ibrim after circumambulating the House and running between al-Safa and aI-Marwa (and thus convert his Ihram from that of Hajj to 'Umra). 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: The flesh of cow was sent to us on the Day of Sacrifice (10th of Dhu'I-Hijja). I said. What is this? It was said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sacrificed (the cow) on behalf of his wives. Yabyi said: I made a mention of this hadith (what has been stated by Umra) to Qisim b. Muhammad, whereupon be said: By Allah, she has rightly narrated it to you.
[2780]
This hadlth has been narrated by Yahyi through the same chain of transmitters.
[2781]
AI-Qasim narrated from the Mother of the Believers (Hadrat 'A'isha) that she said: Messenger of Allah. the people return (from Mecca) having ione two worships (both Hajj and Umra), but I am coming back with one (only). whereupon he said: You should wait and when the period of menses is over, you should go to Tan'im and put on lhram and then meet us at such and such time (and I think he said tomorrow); and (the reward of this Umra) is for you equal to your hardship or your spending.
[2782]
Ibn al-Muththanna reported on the authority of Ibn Abu'Adi who transmit- ted on the authority of Ibn'Aun who narrated from al-Qasim and Ibrahim having said: I cannot differentiate the badith of one from the other (Q[Lsim and Ibribim) that the Mother of the Believers (Allah be pleased with her) said this: Messenger of Allah, people have come back with two acts of worship. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2783]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and we did not see but that he (intended to perform) Rajj (only), but when we reached Mecca we circmambulated the House; and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded that he who did not have with him a sacrificial animal should put off Ihram. She (A'isha) said: (And consequent- ly) those who did not bring the sacrificial anima)s with them put off Ihram; and among his wives (too) who had not brought the sacrificial animals with them put off Ihram. A'isha said: I entered in the monthly period and could not (therefore) circumambulate the House. When it was the night of Hasba she said: Messenger of Allah, people are coming.back (after having performed @oth) Hajj and'Umra, whereas I am coming back only with Hajj, whereupon he said: Did you not eircumambulate (the Ka'ba) that very night we intered Mecca? She (A'isha) said: No, whereupon he said: Go along with your brother to Tan'im and put on the Ihram for Umra, and it is at such and such a place that you can meet (us). (In the meanwhile) Safiyya (the wife of the Holy Prophet) said: I think, I will detain you (since I have entered in the monthly) period and you shall have to wait for me for the farewell circuit). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: May you be wounded and your head shorn did you not circumambulate on the Day of Sacrifice (10th of Dhu'I-Hijja)? She said: Yes. The Holy Prophet (way peace be upon him) said: There is no harm. You should go forward. 'A'isha said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was going upwards to the side of Mecca, whereas I was coming down from it, or I was going upward, whereas he was coming down. Isbiq said: She was clim bing down, and he was climbing down.
[2784]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased, with her) reported: We went out with the Mes. senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya having no explicit inten- tion of Pilgrimage or 'Umra. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2785]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out on the 4th or 5th of Dhul'I-Hijja (for Pilgrimage to Mecca) and came to me, and he was very angry. I said: Messenger of Allah, who has annoyed you ? May Allah cast him in fire I He said: Don't you know that I commanded the people to do an act, but they are hesitant. (Hakam said : I think that he said: They seem to be hesitant.) And if I were to know my affair before what I had to do subsequently, I would not have brought with me the sacrificial animals, and would have bought them (at Mecca) and would have put off lhram as others have done.
[2786]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out (for Pilgrimage) on The 4th or 5th of Dbu'l Hjjja. The rest of the hadith is the same, but he (the narrator) made no mention of the doubt of Hakam about his (the Prophet's) words: "They were reluctant."
[2787]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that she put on Ihram for ,Umra and arrived 'at Mecca) but did not circumambulate the House as she had entered in the period of menses, and then put on Ihram for Hajj and performed all the rituals concerning it (except circumambulating the House). The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to her on the day of march (when pilgrims come to Mina) : Your circumambulation would suffice both Hajj and Umra. She, however, felt reluc- tant.Thereupon the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) sent her with 'Abd al- Rahman to Tan'im and she performed Umra (with separate rituals) after Hajj.
[2788]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that she entered in the monthly period at Sarif, and took bath at 'Arafa (after the period was over). The messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to her: Your circumambulation between al Safa and al-Marwa is enough for your Hajj and 'Umra.
[2789]
Safiyya hint Shaiba reported that 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: Messenger of Allah, lo ! the people are returning with two rewards whereas I am return- ing with one reward. Thereupon he commanded 'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr to take her to al-Tan'im. She ('A'isha) said: He seated me behind him on his camel. She(further) stated: I lifted my head covering and took it off from my neck. He struck my foot as if he was striking the camel. I said to him: Do you find anyone bere? She (further) said : I entered into the state of Ihram fond. 'Umra till we reached the Messen- ger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was at Hasba.
[2790]
Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered him to mount A'isha behind him and enable her to (enter into the state of Ibrim for 'Umra) at Tan'im.
[2791]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) said: We, in the state of lhram, came with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for Hajj Mufrad (with the aim of Hajj only), and 'A'isha set out for Umra, and when we reached Sarif, she (Hadrat A'isha) entered in the state of monthly period; we proceeded on till we reached (Mecca) and circutnambulated the Ka'ba and ran between (al-Safa) and al-Marwa; and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded that one who amongst us had no sacrificial animal with him should put off Ihram. We said: What does this "Putting off" imply? He said: Getting out completely from the state of lhram, (so we put off Ihram), and we turned to our wives and applied perfume and put on our clothes. and we were at a four night's distance from 'Arafa. And we again put on Ihram on the day of Tarwiya (8th of Dhu'l-Hijja). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and found her weeping, and said: What is the matter with you? She said: The matter is that I have entered in the monthly period, and the people had put off lhram, but I did not and I did not circumambulate the House, and the people are going for Hajj now (but I can't go), whereupon he said: It is the matter which Allah has ordaiucd for the daughters of Adam, so now take a bath and put on Ihram for Hajj. She ('A'isha) did accordingly, and stayed at the places of staying till the monthly period was over. She then circu- mambulated the House, and (ran between) al-Safa and al-Marwa. He (the Holy Prophet) then said: Now both your Hajj and 'Umra are complete, whereupon she said: I feel in my mind that I did not circumambulate the House till I performed Hajj (I missed the circumambulation of 'Umra). Thereupon he (Allah's Apostle) said: 'Abd al- Rahman, take her to Tan'im (so as to enable her) to perform Umra (separately), and it was the night at Hasba.
[2792]
Jabir b. Abdullah is reported to have said that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and she was weeping. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2793]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) enter- ed into the state of Ihram (separately) for 'Umra while the Prophet (may peace be upon him) was performing Hajj. The rest of the hadith is the same, but with this addi- tion: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was a person of gentle disposi- tion, so when she (A'Isha) wished for a thing, he accepted it (provided it did not contravene the teachings of Islam). So he (in pursuance of her desire for a separate lhram for Umra) sent her with 'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr and she put on Ihram for 'Umra at al-Tan'im. Matar and Abu Zubair (the two narrators amongst the chain of transmitters) said: Whenever 'A'isha performed Hajj she did as she bad done along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[2794]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) said.: We went with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in 'a state of Ihram for the Hajj. There were women and children with us. When we reached Mecca we circumambulated the House and (ran) between al-Safa and al-Marwa. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who has no sacrificial animal with him should put off lhram. We said: What kind of putting off? He said: Getting out of lhram completely. So we came to our wives, and put on our clothes and applied perfume. When it was the day of Tarwiya, we put on Ihram for Hajj. and the first circumambulation and (running) between al-Safa and al-Marwa sufficed us..Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded us to become seven partners (in the sacrifice) of a camel and a cow.
[2795]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered us to put on Ihram (again) as we proceeded towards Mina after we had put it off (i.e.'on the 8th of Dhu'l-Hijja). So we pronounced Talbiya at al-Abtah.
[2796]
Jabir b. Abdullah is reported to have said: Neither Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) nor his Companions (circumambulated the Ka'ba and) ran between al-Safa and al-Marwa but once (sufficing both for Hajj and 'Umra). But in the hadith transmitted by Muhammad b. Bakr there is an addition: "That is first circumambu- lation."
[2797]
'Ata'reported: I, along with some people, heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah saying: We the Companions of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) put on Ihram for Hajj only. Ata' further said that Jabir stated: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came on the 4th of Dhu'l-Hijja and he commanded us to put off Ihram. 'Ata'said that he (Allah's Apostle) commanded them to put off Ihram and to go to their wives (for inter- course). 'Ata' said: It was not obligatory for them, but (intercourse) with them had become permissible. We said: When only five days had been left to reach 'Arafa, he (the Holy Prophet) commanded us to have intercourse with our wives. And we reached 'Arafa in a state as if we had just intercoursed (with tbem). He ('Ata') said: Jabir pointed with his hand and I (perceive) as if I am seeing his hand as it moved. In the (meantime) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood amongst us and said: You are well aware that I am the most God-fearing, most truthful and most pious amongst you. And if there were not sacrificial animals with me, I would also have put off Ihram as you have put off. And if I were to know this matter of mine what I have come to know later on. I would not have brought sacrificial'animals with me. SO they (the Companions) put.olf Ihrim and we also put off and listened to (the Holy Prophet) and obeyed (his command). Jabir said: 'All came with the revenue of the taxes (from Yemen). He (the Holy Prophet) said: For what (purpose) have you entered into the state of Ihram (whether you entered into the state purely for Hajj and ,Umra jointly or Hajj and Umra separately)? He said: For the purpose for which the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had entered. (The Holy Prophet had entered as a Qiran, i.e. Ihram covering both Umra and Hajj simultaneously.) Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Offer a sacrifice of animal, and retain Ihram. And 'All brought a sacrificial animal for him (for the Holy Prophet). Suraqa b. Malik b. Ju'shum said: Messenger of Allah, is it (this concession putting off Ihram of Hajj or Umra) meant for this year or is it for ever?.He said: It is for ever.
[2798]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We entered with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the state of Ihram for Hajj. When we came to Mecca he commanded us to put off Ihrim and make it for 'Umra. We felt It (the command) hard for us, and our hearts were anguished on account of this and it (this reaction of the people) reached the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). We do not know whether he received (this news) from the Heaven (through revelation) or from the people. (Whatever the case might be) he said; O people, put off Ihram. If there were not the sacrificial animals with me, I would have done as you do. So we put off the Ihram (after performing Umra), and we bad intercourse with our wives and did everything which a non-Muhrim does (applying perfume, putting on clothes, etc.), and when It was the day of Tarwiya (8th of Dhu'l-Hijja) we turned our back to Mecca (in order to go to Mini, 'Arafat) and we put on lhram for Hajj.
[2799]
Musa b. Nafi reported: I came to Mecca as a Mutamattil for Umra (per- forming Umra first and then putting off lhram and again entering into the state of Ihram for Hajj) four days before the day of Tarwiya (i.e. on tee 4th of Dhu'l-Hijja). Thereupon the people said: Now yours is the Hajj of the Meccans. I went to 'Ata' b. Abi Rabah and asked his religious verdict. Ata' said: Jabir b. 'Abdullah al'Ans-ari (Allah be pleased wa'th them) narrated to me that he peirforfned Hajj with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the year when he took sacrificial animals with him (i.e. during the 10th year of Hijra known as the Farewell Pilgrimage) and they had put on Ihram for Hajj only (as Mufrid). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Put off Ihram and circumambulate the House, and (run) between al-Safa and al-Marwa. and get your hair cut and stay as non-Muhrims. When it was the day of Tarwiya, then put on Ihram for Hajj and make lhram for Mut'a (you had put on Ihram i f or Hajj, but take it off af ter perf orming Umra and then again put on Ihram for Hajj). They said: How should we make it Mut'a although we entered upon lhram in the name of Hajj? He said: Do whatever I command you to do. Had I not brought sacrificial animals with me, I would have done as I have commanded you to do. But it is not permissible for me to put off Ihram till tLe sacrifice is offered. Then they also did accordingly.
[2800]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We set out with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as Muhrim for Hajj. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to make this Ihram for Umra, and some put it off (af ter performing 'Umra), but the Prophet (may peace be upon him) had sacrificial animals with him, so he could not make it (this Ihram) as that of Umra.
[2801]
Abu Nadra reported: Ibn'Abbas commanded the performance of Mut'a putting lhram for 'Umra during the months of Dhu'I-Hijja and after completing it. then putting on Ibrim for Hajj), but Ibn Zubair forbade to do it. I made a mention of it to Jabir b. Abdullih and he said: It is through me that this hadith has been circulated. We entered into the state of Ihram as Tamattu' with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). When 'Umar was Installed as Caliph, he said: Verily Allah made permissible for His Messenger (may peace be upon him) whatever He liked and as Re liked. And (every command) of the Holy Qur'an has been revealed for every occasion. So accomplish Hajj and Umra for Allah as Allah has commanded you; and confirm by (proper conditions) the marriage of those women (with whom you have performed Mut'a). And any person would come to me with a marriage of appointed duration (Mut'a), I would stone him (to death). Qatada narrated this hadith with the same chain of transmitters saying: (That 'Umar also said): Separate your Hajj from 'Umra, for that is the most complete Hajj, and complete your Umra.
[2802]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We came with the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya for Hajj, and the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) commanded us to make (our Ihram) into that of Umra.
FAREWELL PILGRIMAGE OF THE APOSTLE OF ALLAH (MAY PEACE BE UPON HIM)
Just as the first revelation in the cave of Hira' marks the advent of the apostolic mission of Muhammad (May peace be upon him), similarly his Farewell Pilgrimage marks its crowning glory. Opinions differ as to when Hajj became obligatory but the commonly accepted opinion is that it was in the eighth year of Hijra that Allah declared it as one of the five fundamentals of Islam. In the ninth year of Hijra the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) sent Abu Bakr as the leader of the Hajj delegation but he himself did not go. Hadrat Abu Bakr was later on joined by Hadrat Ali in order to make a sure declaration on behalf of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) which concerned the freedom from obligation in regard to those idolatrous tribes who had shown no respect for the treaties which they had entered into with the Holy Prophet (May peace be upon him). This declaration is contains in the opening verses of Sura Tauba.
The Holy Prophet (May peace be upon him) spent this year in making preparations for the Hajj in the tenth year of Hijra which coincided with the sixty-third year (the last year) of his life. Every attempt was, therefore, made to take full advantage of this great assembly. Messengers were sent to all parts of Arabia inviting people to join him in this great Pilgrimage. It was necessary for them since they should learn by first-hand knowledge the several injunctions and practices of the Pilgrimage-free from all taints of ignorance-an ideal pattern which was to be kept intact in its pristine glory for all times to come. Not only the rites and rituals of the Pilgrimage were to be finally explained by the Holy Prophet (May peace be upon him) but all those things which had any concern with Islam had been finalized.
The Holy Prophet (May peace be upon him) delivered a khutba on the 24th of Dhi-Qa'da on the occasion of the Friday prayer and gave the Muslims necessary instructions relating to Hajj. Next day, I.e. on the 25th of Dhi-Qa'da, he set out after Zuhr prayer on a journey for Hajj along with thousands of his devoted Companions. The 'Asr prayer was offered at Dhu'l-Hulaifa. The caravan spent the night there and it was there after the Zuhr prayer that the Holy Prophet (May peace be upon him) and his Companions put on Ihram and proceeded towards Mecca. They reached their destination on the 4th of Dhu'l-Hijja pronouncing Talbiya (Labbaik, Labbaik, Allahumma Labbaik).
As the caravan moved on the number of participants swelled till, according to some of the narrators, it reached more than one lakh and thirty thousands. The Farewell Pilgrimage is one of the most important occasions in the sacred life of Muhammad (May peace be upon him). Apart from the rites and rituals, the addresses and speeches of the Holy Prophet (May peace be upon him) succinctly sum up the teachings of Islam.
[2803]
Ja'far b Muhammad reported on the authority of his father: We went to Jabir b. Abdullah and he began inquiring about the people (who had gone to see him) till it was my turn. I said: I am Muhammad b. 'Ali b. Husain. He placed his hand upon my head and opened my upper button and then the lower one and then placed his palm on my chest (in order to bless me), and I was, during those days, a young boy, and he said: You are welcome, my nephew. Ask whatever you want to ask. And I asked him but as he was blind (he could not respond to me immediately), and the time for prayer came. He stood up covering himself in his mantle. And whenever he placed its ends upon his shoulders they slipped down on account of being short (in size). Another mantle was, however, lying on the clothes rack near by. And he led us in the prayer. I said to him: Tell me about the Hajj of Allah's Messenger (May peace be upon him). And he pointed with his hand nine, and then stated: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stayed in (Medina) for nine years but did not perform Hajj, then he made a public announcement in the tenth year to the effect that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was about to perform the Hajj. A large number of persons came to Medina and all of them were anxious to follow the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) and do according to his doing. We set out with him till we reached Dhu'l-Hulaifa. Asma' daughter of Umais gave birth to Muhammad b. Abu Bakr. She sent message to the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) asking him: What should I do? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Take a bath, bandage your private parts and put on Ihram. The Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) then prayed in the mosque and then mounted al-Qaswa (his she-camel) and it stood erect with him on its back at al-Baida'. And I saw as far as I could see in front of me but riders and pedestrians, and also on my right and on my left and behind me like this. And the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was prominent among us and the (revelation) of the Holy Qur'an was descending upon him . And it is he who knows (its true) significance. And whatever he did, we also did that. He pronounced the Oneness of Allah (saying): "Labbaik, 0 Allah, Labbaik, Labbaik. Thou hast no partner, praise and grace is Thine and the Sovereignty too; Thou hast no partner." And the people also pronounced this Talbiya which they pronounce (today). The Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) did not reject anything out of it. But the Messenger of Allah (May peace.be upon him) adhered to his own Talbiya. Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) said: We did not have any other intention but that of Hajj only, being unaware of the Umra (at that season), but when we came with him to the House, he touched the pillar and (made seven circuits) running three of them and walking four. And then going to the Station of Ibrahim, he recited: "And adopt the Station of Ibrahim as a place of prayer." And this Station was between him and the House. My father said (and I do not know whether he had made a mention of it but that was from Allah's Apostle [May peace be upon him] that he recited in two rak'ahs: "say: He is Allah One," and say: "Say: 0 unbelievers." He then returned to the pillar (Hajar Aswad) and kissed it. He then went out of the gate to al-Safa' and as he reached near it he recited: "Al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the signs appointed by Allah," (adding:) I begin with what Allah (has commanded me) to begin. He first mounted al-Safa' till he saw the House, and facing Qibla he declared the Oneness of Allah and glorified Him, and said: "There is no god but Allah, One, there is no partner with Him. His is the Sovereignty. to Him praise is due. and He is Powerful over everything. There is no god but Allah alone, Who fulfilled His promise, helped His servant and routed the confederates alone." He then made supplication in the course of that saying such words three times. He then descended and walked towards al-Marwa, and when his feet came down in the bottom of the valley, he ran, and when he began to ascend he walked till he reached al-Marwa. There he did as he had done at al-Safa'. And when it was his last running at al-Marwa he said: If I had known beforehand what I have come to know afterwards, I would not have brought sacrificial animals and would have performed an 'Umra. So, he who among you has not the sacrificial animals with him should put off Ihram and treat it as an Umra. Suraqa b. Malik b. Ju'sham got up and said: Messenger of Allah, does it apply to the present year, or does it apply forever? Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) intertwined the fingers (of one hand) into another and said twice: The 'Umra has become incorporated in the Hajj (adding): "No, but for ever and ever." 'All came from the Yemen with the sacrificial animals for the Prophet (May peace be upon him) and found Fatimah (Allah be pleased with her) to be one among those who had put off Ihram and had put on dyed clothes and had applied antimony. He (Hadrat'Ali) showed disapproval to it, whereupon she said: My father has commanded me to do this. He (the narrator) said that 'Ali used to say in Iraq: I went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) showing annoyance at Fatimah for what she had done, and asked the (verdict) of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) regarding what she had narrated from him, and told him that I was angry with her, whereupon he said: She has told the truth, she has told the truth. (The Holy Prophet then asked 'Ali): What did you say when you undertook to go for Hajj? I ('Ali) said: 0 Allah, I am putting on Ihram for the same purpose as Thy Messenger has put it on. He said: I have with me sacrificial animals, so do not put off the Ihram. He (Jabir) said: The total number of those sacrificial animals brought by 'Ali from the Yemen and of those brought by the Apostle (may peace be upon him) was one hundred. Then all the people except the Apostle (may peace be upon him) and those who had with them sacrificial animals, put off Ihram , and got their hair clipped; when it was the day of Tarwiya (8th of Dhu'l-Hijja) they went to Mina and put on the Ihram for Hajj and the Messenger of Ailah (may peace be upon him) rode and led the noon, afternoon, sunset 'Isha' and dawn prayers. He then waited a little till the sun rose, and commanded that a tent of hair should be pitched at Namira. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then set out and the Quraish did not doubt that he would halt at al-Mash'ar al-Haram (the sacred site) as the Quraish used to do in the pre-Islamic period. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), however, passed on till he came to 'Arafa and he found that the tent had been pitched for him at Namira. There he got down till the sun had passed the meridian; he commanded that al-Qaswa should be brought and saddled for him. Then he came to the bottom of the valley, and addressed the people saying: Verily your blood, your property are as sacred and inviolable as the sacredness of this day of yours, in this month of yours, in this town of yours. Behold ! Everything pertaining to the Days of Ignorance is under my feet completely abolished. Abolished are also the blood-revenges of the Days. of Ignorance. The first claim of ours on blood-revenge which I abolish is that of the son of Rabi'a b. al-Harith, who was nursed among the tribe of Sa'd and killed by Hudhail. And the usury of she pre-Islamic period is abolished, and the first of our usury I abolish is that of 'Abbas b. 'Abd al-Muttalib, for it is all abolished. Fear Allah concerning women ! Verily you have taken them on the security of Allah, and intercourse with them has been made lawful unto you by words of Allah. You too have right over them, and that they should not allow anyone to sit on your bed whom you do not like. But if they do that, you can chastise them but not severely. Their rights upon you are that you should provide them with food and clothing in a fitting manner. I have left among you the Book of Allah, and if you hold fast to it, you would never go astray. And you would be asked about me (on the Day of Resurrection), (now tell me) what would you say? They (the audience) said: We will bear witness that you have conveyed (the message), discharged (the ministry of Prophethood) and given wise (sincere) counsel. He (the narrator) said: He (the Holy Prophet) then raised his forefinger towards the sky and pointing it at the people (said): "O Allah, be witness. 0 Allah, be witness," saying it thrice. (Bilal then) pronounced Adhan and later on Iqama and he (the Holy Prophet) led the noon prayer. He (Bilal) then uttered Iqama and he (the Holy Prophet) led the afternoon prayer and he observed no other prayer in between the two. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then mounted his camel and came to the place of stay, making his she-camel al-Qaswa, turn towards the side where there we are rocks, having the path taken by those who went on foot in front of him, and faced the Qibla. He kept standing there till the sun set, and the yellow light had somewhat gone, and the disc of the sun had disappeared. He made Usama sit behind him, and he pulled the nosestring of Qaswa so forcefully that its head touched the saddle (in order to keep her under perfect control), and he pointed out to the people with his right hand to be moderate (in speed), and whenever he happened to pass over an elevated tract of sand, he slightly loosened it (the nose-string of his camel) till she climbed up and this is how he reached al-Muzdalifa. There he led the evening and 'Isha prayers with one Adhan and two Iqamas and did not glorify (Allah) in between them (i.e. he did not observe supererogatory rak'ahs between Maghrib and 'Isha' prayers). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then lay down till dawn and offered the dawn prayer with an Adhan and Iqama when the morning light was clear. He again mounted al-Qaswa, and when he came to al-Mash'ar al-Haram, he faced towards Qibla, supplicated Him, Glorified Him, and pronounced His Uniqueness (La ilaha illa Allah) and Oneness, and kept standing till the daylight was very clear. He then went quickly before the sun rose, and seated behind him was al-Fadl b. 'Abbas and he was a man having beautiful hair and fair complexion and handsome face. As the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) was moving on, there was also going a group of women (side by side with them). Al-Fadl began to look at them. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) placed his hand on the face of Fadl who then turned his face to the other side, and began to see, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turned his hand to the other side and placed it on the face of al-Fadl. He again turned his face to the other side till he came to the bottom of Muhassir.1680 He urged her (al-Qaswa) a little, and, following the middle road, which comes out at the greatest jamra, he came to the jamral682which is near the tree. At this be threw seven small pebbles, saying Allah-o-Akbar while throwing every one of them in a manner in which the small pebbles are thrown (with the help of fingers) and this he did in the bottom of the valley. He then went to the place of sacrifice, and sacrificed sixty-three (camels) with his own hand.1694 Then he gave the remaining number to 'All who sacrificed them, and he shared him in his sacrifice. He then commanded that a piece of flesh from each animal sacrificed should be put in a pot, and when it was cooked, both of them (the Holy Prophet and Hadrat 'All) took some meat out of it and drank its soup. The Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) again rode and came to the House, and offered the Zuhr prayer at Mecca. He came to the tribe of Abd al-Muttalib, who were supplying water at Zamzam, and said: Draw water. 0 Bani 'Abd al-Muttalib; were it not that people would usurp this right of supplying water from you, I would have drawn it along with you. So they handed him a basket and he drank from it.
[2804]
Ja'far b. Muhammad narrated on the authority of his father thus: I came to Jabir b. Abdullah and asked him about the (Farewell) Pilgrimage of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The rest of the hadith is the same, but with the addition of this: "There was one Abu Sayyara among the Arabs, (of pre-Islamic period) who carried (people from Muzdalifa to Mini). As the Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon him) set out from Muzdalifa to al-Mash'ar al-Haram, the Quraish were certain that he would halt there and that would be his station. But he passed on (without staying) there. and paid no heed to it till he came to 'Arafat and there he stayed."
[2805]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (May peace be upon him) as saying: I have sacrificed (the animals) here, and the whole of Mini is a place for sacrifice; so sacrifice your animals at your places. I have stayed here (near these rocks), and the whole of Arafat is a place for stay. And I have stayed here (at Muzdalifa near Mash'ar al-Haram and the whole of Muzdalifa) is a place for stay (i.e. one is permitted to spend night in any part of it, as one likes).
[2806]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) proceeded to Mecca, he came to it (the Black Stone). he kissed it. and moved to his right. and moved quickly in three circuits, and walked in four circuits.
[2807]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Quraish (of the pre-Islamic days) and those who followed their religions practices stayed at Muzdalifa, and they named themselves as Hums, whereas all other Arabs stayed at 'Arafa. With the advent of Islam, Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, commanded His Apostle (may peace be upon him) to come to 'Arafat and stay there, and then hurry from there, and this is the significance of the words of Allah: "Then hasten on from where the people hasten on."
[2808]
Hisham narrated on the authority of his father that the Arabs with the exception of Hums who were Quraish, and their descendants, circumambulated the House naked. They kept circumambulating In this state of nudity unless the Hums supplied to them the clothes. The male provided (clothes) to the male and the female provided clothes to the female. And the Hums did not get out of Muzdalifa, whereas the people (other than the Quraish) went t o 'Arafat. Hisham said on the authority of his father who related from 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) who said: Hums are those about whom Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse: "Then hasten to where the people hasten." She (further) said: The people hastened on from 'Arafat, whereas Hums hastened from Muzdalifa, and said: We'do not hasten but from Haram. But when this (verse) was revealed: "Hasten on from that (place) where the people hasten on," they (the Quraish) then went to 'Arafat.
[2809]
Jubair. b. Mut'im reported: I lost my camel and went in search of it on the day of 'Arafa, and I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) staying along with people in 'Ara'fit. Thereupon I said: By Allah, he is among the Hums (Quraish) ; what has happened to him that he has come to this (place)? The Quraish were counted among Hums.
[2810]
Abu Musa (Allah be pleased with him) said: I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was encamping at Batha. He said to me: Did you intend to perform Hajj? I said: Yes. He again said: With what intention have you entered into the state of Ihram (for Ifrad, Qiran or Tamattu'). I said: I pronounced Talbiya (I have entered into the state of Ihram ) with that very aim with which the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) is pronouncing Talbiya. He (the Holy Prophet) said; You have done well. Then circumambulate the House and run between al-Safa' and al-Marwa' and put off Ihram (as you have not brought the sacrificial animals along with you). So I circumambulated the House, and ran between al-Safa' and al-Marwa' and then came to a woman of the tribe of Qais and she rid my head of the lice. I again put on Ihram for Hajj. and continued giving religious verdict (according to this practice) till during the Caliphate of Umar (Allah be pleased with him) when a person said to him: Abu Musa, or Abdullah b. Qais, exercise restraint in delivering some religious verdict of yours, for you do not know what has been introduced after you by the Commander of the Believers in the rites (of Hajj). Thereupon he said: 0 people, whom we gave the religious verdict (concerning putting off Ihram ) they should wait, for the Commander of the Believers is about to come to you, and you should follow him. Umar (Allah be pleased with him) then came and I made a mention of it to him. whereupon he said: If we abide by the Book of Allah (we find) the Book of Allah has commanded us to complete the (.Hajj and 'Umra), and if we abide by the Sunnah of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), we find that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not put off Ihram till the sacrificial animal was brought to its end (till it was sacrificed).
[2811]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2812]
Abu Musa (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was encamping at Batha. He (the Holy Prophet) said: With what purpose have you entered into the state of Ihram ? I said: I have entered into the state of Ihram in accordance with the Ihram of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He said: Have you brought sacrificial animals along with you? I said: No. whereupon he said: Then circumambulate the House and run between al-Safa' and al-Marwa and put off Ihram . So I circumambulated the House, ran between al-Safa' and al-Marwa, and then came to a woman of my tribe. She combed and washed my head. I used to give religious verdict (according to the above mentioned command of the Holy Prophet) during the Caliphate of Abu Bakr and also during that of 'Umar. And it was during the Hajj season that a person came to me and said: You (perhaps) do not know what the Commander of the Believers has introduced in the rites (of Hajj). I said: 0 people, those whom we have given religious verdict about a certain thing should wait, for the Commander of the Believers is about to arrive among you, so follow him. When the Commander of the Believers arrived, I said: What is this that you have introduced in the rites (of Hajj)? -where upon he said: If we abide by the Book of Allah (we find) that there Allah, Exalted and Majestic, has said: Complete Hajj and 'Umra for Allah." And if we abide by the Sunnah of our Apostle (may peace be upon him) (we find) that the Apostle of Allah (May peace be upon him) did not put off Ihram till he had sacrificed the animals.
[2813]
Abu Musa (Allah be pleased with him) reported: The Messenger of Allah (May peace be upon im) had sent me to Yemen and I came back In the year in which he (the Holy Prophet) performed the (Farewell) Pilgrimage. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon, him) said to me: Abu Musa, what did you ' say when you entered into the state of Ihram? I said: At thy beck and call; my (Ihram) is that of the Ihram of Allah's Apostle (May peace be upon him). He said: Have you brought the sacrificial animals? I said: No. Thereupon he said: Go and circumambulate the House, and (run) between al-Safa' and al-Marwa and then put off Ihram. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2814]
Abu Musa, (Allah be pleased with him) reported that he used to deliver religious verdict in favor of Hajj Tamattu'. A person said to him: Exercise restraint in delivering some of your religious verdicts, for you do not know what the Commander of Believers has introduced in the rites (of Hajj) after you (when you were away in Yemen). He (Abu Musa,) met him (Hadrat Umar) subsequently and asked him (about it), whereupon 'Umar said: I know that Allah's Apostle (May peace be upon him) and also his Companions did that (observed Tamattu'), but I do not approve that the married persons should have intercourse with their wives under the shade of the trees, and then set out for Hajj with water trickling down from their beads.
[2815]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported that 'Uthman (Allah be pleased with him) used to forbid Tamattu', whereas 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) ordered to do it. 'Uthman said a word to 'Ali, but 'Ali said: You know that we used to perform Tamattu' with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) , whereupon he said: It is right, but we entertained fear. This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2816]
Sa'id b. al-Musayyab reported that 'Ali and 'Uthman (Allah be pleased with them) met at 'Usfan; and Uthman used to forbid (people) from performing Tamattu' and 'Umra (during the period of Hajj), whereupon 'Ali said: What is your opinion about a matter which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did but you forbid it? Thereupon Uthman said: You leave us alone, whereupon he ('Ali) said: I cannot leave you alone. When 'Ali saw this, he put on Ihram for both of them together (both for Hajj and 'Umra).
[2817]
Abu Dharr (Allah be pleased with him) said that Tamattu' in Ha was a special (concession) 1694 for the Companions of Muhammad (may peace be upon him).
[2818]
Abu Dharr (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Tamattu' in Hajj was a special concession for us.
[2819]
Abu Dharr (Allah be pleased with him) said: Two are the Mut'as which were not permissible but only for us, i.e. temporary marriage with women and Tamattu' in Hajj.
[2820]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Abi al-Sha'tha' reported: I came to Ibrahim al-Nakha'I and Ibrahim Taimi and said: I intend to combine 'Umra and Hajj this year, whereupon Ibrahim al-Nakha'i said: But your father did not make such intention. Ibrahim narrated on the authority of, his father that he passed by Abu Dharr (Allah be pleased with him) at Rabdha, and made a mention of that, whereupon he said: It was a special concession for us and not for you.
[2821]
Ghunaim b. Qais said: I asked Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas (Allah be pleased with him) about Mut'a, whereupon he said: We did that, and it was the day when he was an unbeliever living in (one of the) houses of Mecca.
[2822]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sulaiman Taimi with the same chain of transmitters and in his narration (he) refers to Mu'awiya.
[2823]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Sulaiman (but with a slight modification of words).
[2824]
Mutarrif reported: 'Imran b. Husain said to me: Should I not narrate to you a hadith today by which Allah will benefit you subsequently-and bear in mind that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made some members of his family perform 'Umra within ten days of Dhu'l-Hijja. No verse was revealed to abrogate that, and he (the Holy Prophet) did not refrain from doing it till he died. So after him everyone said as he liked, (but it would be his. personal opinion and not the verdict of the Shari'ah).
[2825]
This hadith been narrated on the authority of Jurairi with the same chain of transmitters, and Ibn Hatim said in his narration: "A person said according to his personal opinion, and it was Umar."
[2826]
Imran b. Husain reported: I am narrating to you a hadith by which Allah will benefit you (and the hadith is) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) combined Hajj and 'Umra, and he did not forbid (this combination) till he died. (Moreover) nothing was revealed in the Holy Qur'an which forbade it. And I was always blessed till I was branded and then it (blessing) was abandoned. I then abandoned branding and it (the blessing was restored).
[2827]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mutarrif with the same chain of transmitters.
[2828]
Mutarrif reported: 'Imran b. Husain sent for me during his illness of which he died, and said: I am narrating to you some ahadith which may benefit you after me. If I live you conceal (the fact that these have been transmitted by me), and if I die, then you narrate them if you like (and these are): I am blessed, and bear in mind that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combined Hajj and Umra. Then no verse was revealed in regard to it in the Book of Allah (which abrogated it) and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not forbid (from doing it). And whatever a person (,Umar) said was out of his personal opinion.
[2829]
'Imran b. al-Husain (Allah be pleased with him) said: Know well that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) combined 'Hajj and 'Umra, and nothing was revealed in the Book (to abrogate it), and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) too did not forbid us from (combining) them. And whatever a person said was out of his personal opinion.
[2830]
'Imran b. Husain (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We performed Tamattu' (Hajj and 'Umra combining together) in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and nothing was revealed in the Qur'an (concerning the abrogation of this practice), and whatever a person (Hadhrat 'Umar) said was his personal opinion. 'Imran b. Husain narrated this hadith (in these words also): "Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) performed Hajj Tamattu' and we also performed it along with him."
[2831]
'Imran b. Husain said: There was revealed the verse of Tamattu' in Hajj in the Book of Allah and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to perform it. and then no verse was revealed abrogating the Tamattu' (form of Hajj), and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not forbid to do it till he died. So whatever a person said was his personal opinion. A hadith like this is transmitted on the authority of Imran b. Husain, but with this variation that he ('Imran) said: We did that (Tamattu') in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he did not say anything but he (the Holy Prophet) commanded us to do it.
[2832]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed Tamattu' in Hajjat-ul-Wada' .He first put on Ihram for 'Umra and then for Hajj. and then offered animal sacrifice. So he drove the sacrificial animals with him from Dhu'l-Hulaifa. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commenced Ihram of Umra and thus pronounced Talbiya for 'Umra. and then (put on Ihram for Hajj) and pronounced Talbiya for Hajj. And the people performed Tamattu' in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). They put on Ihram for Umra (first) and then for Hajj. Some of them had sacrificial animals which they had brought with them, whereas some of them had none to sacrifice. So when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Mecca, he said to the people: He who amongst you has brought sacrificial animals along with him must not treat as lawful anything which has become unlawful for him till he has completed the Hajj; and he,who amongst you has not brought the sacrificial animals should circumambulate the House, and run between al-Safa' and al-Marwa and clip (his hair) and put off the Ihram, and then again put on the Ihram for Hajj and offer sacrifice of animals. But he who does not find the sacrificial animal, he should observe fast for three days during the Hajj and for seven days when he returns to his family. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) circumambulated (the House) when he came to Mecca: he first kissed the corner (of the Ka'ba containing the Black Stone), then ran in three circuits out of seven and walked in four circuits. And then when he had finished the circumambulation of the House he observed two rak'ahs of prayer at the Station (of Ibrahim), and then pronounced Salaam (for concluding the rak'ahs), and departed and came to al-Safa' and ran seven times between al-Safa' and al-Marwa. After that he did not treat anything as lawful which had become unlawful till he had completed his Hajj and sacrificed his animal on the day of sacrifice (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja). and then went back quickly (to Mecca) and performed circumambulation of the House (known as tawaf ifada) after which all that was unlawful for him became lawful; and those who had brought the sacrificial animals along with them did as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha. The wife of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), concerning his Tamattu' of Hajj and 'Umra and performing of Tamattu' by people in his company.
[2833]
Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her), the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: Messenger of Allah. what about people who have put off Ihram whereas you have not put it off after your 'Umra? He said: I have stuck my hair and have driven my sacrificial animal, and would not, therefore, put off Ihram until I have sacrificed the animal.
[2834]
Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I said: Messenger of Allah what is the matter with you that you have not put off Ihram ? The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2835]
Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): What is the matter with people that they have put off Ihram, whereas you have not put it off after your Umra'? He said: I have driven my sacrificial animal and stuck my hair, and it is not permissible for me to put off Ihram unless I have completed the Hajj.
[2836]
Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her) said: Messenger of Allah; the rest of the hadith is the same and (the concluding words of the Holy Prophet): "I won't put off Ihram until I have sacrificed the animal."
[2837]
Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her) said that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) commanded his wives that they should put off Ihram during the year of Hajj (at-ul-Wada'). whereupon she (Hafsa) said: What hinders you that you have not put off Ihram? Thereupon he said: I have stuck my hair and driven my sacrificial animal along with men and it is not permissible to put off Ihram (under this condition until I have sacrificed the animal .
[2838]
Nafi' reported that 'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) set out for Umra during the turmoil, and he said: If I am detained (from going to) the House, we would do the same as we did with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). So he went out and put on Ihram for 'Umra and moved on until he reached al-Baida'. He turned towards his Companions and said: There is one command for both of them. and I call you as my witness (and say) that verify I have- made Hajj with 'Umra compulsory for me. He proceeded until, when he came to the House, he circumambulated it seven times and ran between al-Safa' and al-Marwa seven times, and made no addition to it and thought it to be sufficient for him and offered sacrifice.
[2839]
Nafi' reported that 'Abdullah b. 'Abdullah and Salim b. Abdullah said to 'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) at the time when Hajjaj came to fight against Ibn Zubair: There would be no harm if you do not (proceed) for Hajj this year, for we fear that there would be fight among people which would cause obstruction between you and the House, whereupon he said: If there would be obstruction between me and that (Ka'ba), I would do as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did. I was with him (the Holy Prophet) when the infidels of Quraish caused obstructions between him (the Holy Prophet) and the House. I call you as my witness (to the fact) that I have made 'Umra essential for me. He proceeded until he came to Dhu'l-Hulaifa and pronounced Talbiya for Umra, and said: If the way Is clear forme, I would then complete my 'Umra but If there is some obstruction between me and that (the Ka'ba). I would then do what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done (at the occasion of Hudaibiya), and I was with him (the Holy Prophet). and then recited: "Verily in the Messenger of Allah, there is a model pattern for you" (xxxiii. 21). He then moved on until he came to the rear side of al-Baida' and said: There is one command for both of them automatically)(Hajj and Umra). If I am detained (in the performance) of 'Umra, I am ( automatically detained (in the performance) of Hajj (too). I call you as witness that Hajj along with 'Umra I had made essential for me. (I am performing Hajj and 'Umra as Qiran.) He then bought sacrificial animals at Qudaid and then circumambulated the House and ran between al-Safa' and al-Marwa once (covering both Hajj and Umra), and did not put off Ihram until on the Day of Sacrifice in the month of Dhu'l-Hijja.
[2840]
Nafi' reported that Ibn Umar intended to go to Hajj (during the year) when Hajjaj attacked Ibn Zubair, and he narrated the account as (narrated above), and he used to say at the end of the hadith: He who combines Hajj with Umra, for him one single circumambulation is sufficient, and he did not put off Ihram until he had completed both of them.
[2841]
Nafi' reported that Ibn Umar intended to go for Hajj during the year when Hajjaj attacked Ibn Zubair. It was said to him: There is a state of war between people and we fear that they would detain you, whereupon he ('Abdullah b. Umar) said: "Verily in the Messenger of Allah there is a model pattern for you." I would do as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did. I call you as witness that I have undertaken to perform 'Umra. He then set out until, when he reached the rear side of al-Baida', he said: There is one command both for Hajj and Umra. so bear witness. Ibn Rumh said: I call you as witness that I have undertaken to perform my Hajjalong with my Umra (i.e. I am performing both of them as Qiran), and he offered the sacrifice of animals which he had bought at Qudaid. He then proceeded pronouncing Talbiya for both of them together until he reached Mecca, He circumambulated the House. and (ran) between al-Safa' and al-Marwa and made no addition to it. He neither sacrificed the animal, nor got his head shaved, nor got his hair clipped, nor did he make anything lawful which was unlawful (due to Ihram) until it was the Day of Sacrifice (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja). He then offered sacrifice, and got his hair cut, and saw that circumambulation of Hajj and 'Umra was complete with the first circumambulation. Ibn 'Umar said: This is how Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done.
[2842]
This hadith has been narrated from Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters except with (this variation) that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was mentioned in the first part of the hadith ,.i.e. when it was said to him: They would bar you (from going) to the House. He said: In that, case I would do what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done. He did not mention at the end of this hadith (i.e. these words): "This is how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had done," as it Is narrated by al-Laith.
[2843]
Nafi' thus reported on the authority of Ibn Umar: We entered into the state of Ihram with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for Hajj Mufrad and in the narration of Ibn 'Aun (the words are): "Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered into the state of Ihram (with the intention) of Hajj Mufrad."
[2844]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) said: I heard Allah's Apostle (way peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya for both Hajj and Umra. Bakr (one of the narrators) said: I narrated it to Ibn 'Umar, whereupon he said: He (the Holy Prophet) pronounced the Talbiya for Hajj alone. I met Anas and narrated to him the words of Ibn 'Umar, whereupon he said: You treat us not but only as children. I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya both for 'Umra and Hajj.
[2845]
Bakr b. 'Abdullah reported: Anas (Allah be pleased with him) had narrated to us that he saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) combining Hajj and 'Umra. He (Bakr) said: I asked (about it) from Ibn 'Umar, whereupon he said: We entered into the state of Ihram for Hajj (only). I came to Anas and told him what Ibn Umar had said, whereupon he remarked: (You are treating us) as if we were children.
[2846]
Wabara reported: While I was sitting in the company of Ibn 'Umar, a person came to him and said: Is it right for me to circumambulate the House before I come to stay (at 'Arafat)? Ibn 'Umar said: Yes. whereupon he said: Ibn Abbas, however, says: Do not circumambulate the House until you come to stay at 'Arafat. Thereupon Ibn 'Umar said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) Performed the Hajj and circumambulated the House before coming to stay (at 'Arafat). If you say the Truth, is it more rightful to follow the saying of the Prophet (may peace be upon him) or the words of Ibn Abbas?
[2847]
Wabara reported: A person asked Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with him): May I circumambulate the House, whereas I have entered-into the state of Ihram for Hajj? Thereupon he said: What prevents you from doing it? He said: I saw the son of so and so showing disapproval of it, and you are dearer to us as compared with him. And we see that he is allured by the world, whereupon he said: Who amongst you and us is not allured by the world? And said (further) ':'We saw that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) put on Ihram for Hajj and circumambulated the House and run between al Safa' and al-Marwa. And the way prescribed by Allah and that prescribed by His Apostle (may peace be upon him) deserve more to be followed than the way shown by so and so, if you speak the truth.
[2848]
Amr b. Dinar said: We asked Ibn Umar about a person who came for Umra and circumambulated the House, but he did not run between al-Safa' and al-Marwa, whether he is allowed to (put off Ihram) and have intercourse with his wife. He replied: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) circumambulated the House seven times and offered two rak'ahs of prayer after staying (at 'Arafat), and ran between al-Safa and al-Marwa seven times. "Verily there is in Allah's Messenger a model pattern for you" (xxxill. 21).
[2849]
This hadith is narrated by another chain of transmitters.
[2850]
Muhammad b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported: A person from Iraq said to him to inquire from 'Urwa b. Zubair for him whether a person who puts on Ihram for Hajj is allowed to put it off or not as he circumambulates the House. And if he says: "No, it can't be put off," then tell him that there is a person who makes such an assertion. He (Muhammad b. 'Abd al-Rahman) then said: I asked him ( Urwa b. Zubair), where- upon he said: The person who has entered into the state of Ihram for Hajj cannot get out of it unless he has, completed the Hajj I (further) said (to him): (What) if a person makes that assertion? Thereupon he said : It is indeed unfortunate that he makes such an assertion. That person ('Iraqi) then met me and he asked me and I narrated to him (the reply of 'Urwa), whereupon he (the Iraqi) said: Tell him ('Urwa) that a person had informed him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done that; and why is it that Asma' and Zubair have done like this? He (Muhammad b. 'Abd al-Rahman) said: I went to him and made a mention of that to him, whereupon he ('Urwa) said: Who is he (the 'Iraqi) ? I said: I do not know, whereupon he said: What is the matter that he does not come to me himself and ask me? I suppose he is an 'Iraqi. I said: I do not know, whereupon he said: He has told a lie. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) performed Hajj, and 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) has told me that the first thing with which he commenced (the rituals) when he arrived at Mecca was that he performed ablution and then circumambulated the Ka'ba. Then Abu Bakr performed Hajj and the first thing with which he commenced (the Hajj) as the circumambulation of the Ka'ba and nothing besides it. So did 'Umar. Then 'Uthman performed Hajj and I saw that the first thing with which he commenced the Hajj was the circumambulation of the Ka'ba and nothing besides it. Then Mu'awiya and Abdullah b. 'Umar did that. Then I performed Hajj with my father Zubair b. al-'Awwam, and the first thing with which he commenced (Hajj) was the circumambulation of the House. He then did nothing besides it. I then saw the emigrants (Muhajirin) and the helpers (Ansar) doing like this and nothing besides it. And the last one whom I saw doing like this was Ibn 'Umar. And he did not break it (the Hajj) after performing 'Umra. And Ibn 'Umar is with them. Why don't they ask him (to testify it)? And none amongst those who had passed away commenced (the rituals of Hajj) but by circumambulating the Ka'ba on their (first arrival) and they did not put off Ihram (without completing the Hajj), and I saw my mother and my aunt commencing (their Hajj) with the circumambulation of the House, and they did not put off Ihram. My mother informed me that she came and her sister, and Zubair and so and so for 'Umra, and when they had kissed the corner (the Black Stone, after Sa'i and circumambulation), they put off Ihram. And he (the 'Iraqi) has told a lie in this matter.
[2851]
Asma bint Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: We set out (to Mecca) in a state of Ihram. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who has the sacrificial animal with him should remain in the state of Ihram, but he who has not the sacrificial animal with him should put off Ihram. As I had not the sacrificial animal with me, I put off Ihram. And since Zubair (her husband)- had the sacrificial animal with him, he did not put off Ihram. She (Asma) said: I put on my clothes and then went out and sat by Zabair, whereupon he said: Go away from me, whereupon I said: Do you fear that I would jump upon you?
[2852]
Asma bint Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with th(m) said: We came for Hajj in the state of Ihram with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The rest of the hadith is the same except (for the words) that he (Zubair) said: Keep away from me, keep away from me, whereupon I said: Do you fear that I will jump upon you?
[2853]
Abdullah, the freed slave of Asma' bint Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with them), narrated that he used to hear Asma,' whenever she passed by Hajun, saying (these words): "May there be peace and blessing of Allah upon His Messenger." We used to stay here along with him with light burdens. Few were our rides, and small were our provisions. I performed 'Umra and so did my sister 'A'isha, and Zubair and so and so. And as we touched the House (performed circumambulation and Sa'i) we put off Ihram, and then again put on Ihram in the afternoon for Hajj. Harun (one of the narrators) in one of the narrations said: The freed slave of Asma' and he did not mention 'Abdullah.
[2854]
Muslim al-Qurri reported: I asked Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) about Tamattu' in Hajj and he permitted it, whereas Ibn Zubair had forbidden it. He (Ibn 'Abbas) said: This is the mother of Ibn Zubair who states that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had permitted it, so you better go to her and ask her about it. He (Muslim al-Qurri said): So we went to her and she was a bulky blind lady and she said: Verily Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted it.
[2855]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of words.
[2856]
Muslim al-Qurri heardlbn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) saying that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) entered into the state of Ihram for Umra and his Companions for Hajj. Neither Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) nor those among his Companions who had brought sacrificial animals with them put off Ihram, whereas the rest (of the pilgrims) did so. Talha b. Ubaidullah was one of those who had brought the sacrificial animals along with them so he did not put off Ihram.
[2857]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation (of words): "Talha and another person also were among those who had not brought the sacrificial animals with them and so they put off Ihram."
[2858]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that they (the Arabs of pre-Islamic days) looked upon Umra during the months of Hajj as the greatest of sins on the earth. So they intercalated the month of Muharram for Safar and said: When the backs of their camels would become all right and traces (if the pilgrims) would be effaced (from the paths) and the month of Safar would be over, then Umra would be permissible for one who wants to perform it. When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and his Companions came in the state of Ihram for performing Hajj on the fourth (of Dhu'l-Hijja) he (Allah's Apostle) commanded them to change their state of Ihram (from Hajj) to that of 'Umra. It was something inconceivable for them. So they said: Messenger of Allah, is it a complete freedom (of the obligation) of Ihram? Thereupon he said: It is a complete freedom (from Ihram).
[2859]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them)'is reported to have said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) put on Ihigm for Hajj. When four days of Dhu'l-Hijja were over, he led the dawn prayer, and when the prayer was complete, he said: He who wants to change it to Umra may do so.
[2860]
Rauh and Yahya b. Kathir narrated as Na5r reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered into the state of Ihram for Hajj. And in the narration of Abu Shihab (the words are): We went out with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya for Hajj, And in an the ahadith (narrated in this connection the words are): He led the morning prayer at al-Batha', except al- jahdami who did not make mention of it.
[2861]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came along with his Companions when four days had passed out of ten days (of Dhu'l-Hijja) and they were pronouncing Talbiya for Hajj, and he (the Holy Prophet) commanded them to change (this Ihram) into that of 'Umra.
[2862]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed the morning prayer at Dhu Tawa (a valley near Mecca) and arrived (in Mecca) when four days of Dhul-Hijja had passed and he commanded his Companions that they should change their Ihram (of Hajj) to that of Umra, except those who had brought sacrificial animals with them.
[2863]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: This is the 'Umra of which we have taken advantage. So he who has not the sacrificial animal with him should get out of the state of Ihram completely, for 'Umra has been incorporated in Hajj until the Day of Resurrection,
[2864]
Abu Jam at al-Dubu'i reported: I performed Tamattu' but the people dis- couraged me to do so. I came to Ibn 'Abbas and asked him about it. He ordered me to do so. I came to the House (Ka'ba) and slept. I saw a visitant in the dream who said: 'Umra is acceptable and so is the Hajj performed for God's sake. I came to Ibn Abbas and informed him about that Which I saw in the dream whereupon he said: Allah is the Greatest, Allah is the Greatest This is the Sunnah of Abu'l-Qasim (the Holy Pro- phet) (may peace be upon him).
[2865]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed the Zuhr prayer at Dhu'l-Hulaifa; then called for his she-camel and marked it on the right side of its bump, removed the blood from it, and tied two sandals round its neck. He then mounted his camel, and when it brought him up to al-Baida', he pronounced Talbiya for the Pilgrimage.
[2866]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation (of words): "When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to Dhu'l-Hulaifa" and he made no mention (of the fact) that he led the Zuhr prayer.
[2867]
Abu Hassan al-A'raj reported that a person from Bani Hujaim said to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): What is this religious verdict of yours which has engaged the attention of the people or which has become a matter of dispute among them that he who circumambulated the House can be free from Ihram? Thereupon he said: That is the Sunnah of your Apostle (may peace be upon him), even though you may not approve of it.
[2868]
Abu Hassan reported: It was said to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) that this affair had engaged the attention of the people that he who circumambu- lates the House was permitted to circumambulate for Umra (even though he was in a state of Ihram for Hajj), whereupon he said: That is the Sunnah of your Apostle (may peace be upon him), even though you may not approve of it.
[2869]
Ata' said: Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) used to say that a pilgrim or non-pilgrim (one performing 'Umar) who circumambulates the House is free from the responsibility of Ihram. I (Ibn Juraij, one of the narrators) said to 'Ata': On what authority does he (Ibn Abbas) say this? He said: On the authority uf Allah's words: "Then their place of sacrifice is the Ancient House" (al-Qur'an, xxii. 33). I said: It concerns the time after staying at 'Arafat, whereupon he said: Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) had stated (that the place of sacrifice is the Ancient House); it way be after staying at 'Arafat or before (staying there). And he (Ibn Abbas) made this deduction I from the command of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) when he had ordered to put off Ihram on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage.
[2870]
Ibn Abbas reported that Mu'awiya had said to them: Do you know that I clipped some hair from the head of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at al- Marwa with the help of a clipper? I said: I do not know it except as it verdict against you.
[2871]
Ibn Abbis (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Mu'awiya b. Abu Safyin had told him: I clipped the hair (from the head of) Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) with a clipper while he was at al-Marwa, or I saw him getting his hair clipped with a clipper as he was at al-Marwa.1722
[2872]
Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We went out with Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) pronouncing loudly the Talbiya for Hajj When we came to Mecca, he commanded us that we should change this (Ibrim for Hajj) to that of Umra except one who had brought the sacrificial animal with him. When it was the day of Tarwiya (8th of Dhu'l-Hijja) and we went to Mini, we (again) pronounced Talbiya for Hajj.
[2873]
jibir and Abil Salld al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We went with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and we were pronouncing Talbiya for Hajj loudly.
[2874]
Abd Nadra reported: While I was in the company of Jibir, a person came and said: There is difference of opinion amomg Ibn Abbas and Ibn Zubair about two Mut'as (benefits, Tamattul in Hajj and temporary marriage with women), whereupon jibir said: We have been doing this during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him), and then 'Umar forbade us to do so, and we never resorted to them.
[2875]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that 'All (Allah be pleased with him) came from the Yemen, and the Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: With (what intention) have you put on Ihram? He said: I have put on Ibram in accordance with the intention with which Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) has put on Ibram, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Had there not been the sacrificial animals with me, I would have put off Ibram (after performing 'Umra). This hadith is narrated by Salim b. Hayyin with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of words.
[2876]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya for both simultaneously, Talbiya for 'Umra and Hajj. Talbiya for Uwra and Hajj (he performed both Hajj and Umra as a Qarin). In another version words are: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pronouncing Talbiya for Umra and Hajj (simultaneously)."
[2877]
Hanzala al-Aslami reported: I heard Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) as narrating from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) who said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life. Ibn Maryam (Jesus Christ) would certainly pronounce Talbiya for Hajj or for Umra or for both (simultaneously as a Qiran) In the valley of Rauha
[2878]
Hanzala b. 'Ali al-Aslaml reported that he had heard Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) as saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) bed said: By Him In Whose Hand is my life; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[2879]
Qatida saia. that Anas (Allah be pleased with him) had informed him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) performed four 'Umras, all during the month of Dhu'l-Qa'da except the one he performed along with Hajj (and these are) the Umra that he performed from al-Hudaibiya or during the time of (the truce of) Hudaibiya in the month of Dhu'l-Qa'da then the Umra of the next year in the month of Dhu'l-Qa'da, then the Umra for which b'e had started from ji'rana, the place where he distributed the spoils of (the battle of) Hunain in the month of Dhu'l-Qa'da, and then the 'Umra that he performed along with his Hajj (on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage).
[2880]
Qatida said: I asked Anas (Allah be pleased with him) as to bow many Pilgrimages had been performed by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he replied: One Hajj and four 'Umras were performed by him. The rest of the badith is the same.
[2881]
Abu lshaq said: I asked Zaid b. Arqam: In how many military expeditions have you participated with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: In seventeen (expeditions). He (Abu Ishaq) said: Zaid b. Arqam reported to me that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had led nineteen expeditions. And he performed Hajj only once after Migration, and that was the Farewell Pilgrimage. Abu Ishaq also said: The second (Hajj) he performed at Mecca (before his Migration to Medina)
[2882]
'Ataa reported that 'Urwa b. Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) had informed him (this): I and Ibn 'Umar were reclining against the (wall) of the apartment of A'isha and we were listening to the sound produced by the brushing of her teeth. I said Abu Abd al-Rahman (the kunya of 'Abdullah b. Umar), did Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) perform 'Umra in the month of Rijab? He said: Yes. I said to 'A'isha: Mother, are you listening to what Abu Abd al-Rabman is saying? She said: What is he Saying? I said: He is saying that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) performed 'Umra during the month of Rajab, whereupon she said: May Allah grant pardon to Abu Abd al-Rahman I By my life he (the Holy Prophet) did not perform 'Umra during the month of Rajab. And never was there an Umra performed by him (the Holy Prophet) in which he ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) did not join him. Ibn 'Umar heard this and said nothing to affirm It or to deny it, but kept quiet.
[2883]
Mujihid reported: I and 'Urwa h Zubair entered the mosque and there found 'Abdullah b. 'Umar sitting near the apartment of IA'isha and the people were observing the forenood"prayer (when the sun bad sufficiently risen). We asked him about their prayer, and he said: It is bid'a (innovation), Urwa said to him: Abd al-Rahman, how many,'Umras had Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) performed? He said: Four Umras, one he performed during the month of Rajab. We were reluctant either to belie him or reject him. We heard the noise of brushing of her teeth by 'A'isha in her apartment. 'Urwa said: Mother of the Faithful, are you not hearing what Abfi 'Abd al-Rahman is saying? She said: What is he saying? Thereupon he ('Urwa) said: He (Ibn 'Umar) states that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) performed four Umras and one of them during the month of Rajab. Thereupon she remarked: May Allah have merely upon Abu 'Abd al-Rahman. Never did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) perform 'Umra in which he did not accompany him, and he (Allah's Apostle) never performed 'Umra during the month of Rajab.
[2884]
Ataa reported: I heard Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) narrating to us that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to a woman of the Ansar (Ibn Abbas had mentioned her name but I have forgotten it):'What has prevented you that you do not perform Hajj along with us? She said: We have only two camels for carrying water. One of the camels has been taken by my husband and my son for performing Hajj and one has been left for us for carrying water, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: So when the month of Ramadan come, perform Umra, for'Umra in this (month) is equal to Hajj (in reward).
[2885]
Ibn Abbis reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to a woman of the Ansar who was called Umm Sinan: What has prevented you that you did not perform Hajj with us? She said: The father of so and so (i.e. her husband) had only two camels. One of them had been taken away by him (my busbard) and his son for Hajj, whereas the other one is used by our boy to carry water. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Umra during the month of Rawadin would suffice for Hajj or Hajj along with me.
[2886]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to come out (of Medina) by way of al-Shajarah and entered it by the way of al-Mu'arras and whenever he entered Mecca, he entered it from the upper side and went out of it from the lower side. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters and in the narration transmitted by Zubair (it is mentioned) that the upper side is that'which is at al-Batha
[2887]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that when Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) came to Mecca he entered from its upper side and came out from its lower side.
[2888]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered Mecca during the year of Victory from Kada I.e. from the upper side. Hisham said.. My father entered It from both the Fides, but generally he entered from Kada.
[2889]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) spent the night at Dhi Tuwa till it was dawn and then entered Mecca. 'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) himself did like it. And in the narration transmitted by Ibn Sa'ld (the words are): Until he obrerved the dawn prayer. Yahya (another narrator) said: Until it was dawn.
[2890]
Nafi' reported that Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) did not enter Mecca without spending the night at Dhi Tawu until it was dawn, when he took a bath, and then entered Mecca in the morning, and made a mention that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did that.
[2891]
Abdullah (b. 'Umar) reported that whenever Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered Mecca, he got down at Dhi Tuwa and spend the night there until he observed the dawn prayer. And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed this prayer on a rough hillock, and not in the mosque which had been then built there, but to the lower side of it (the mosque) on a hillock.
[2892]
Nafi' reported that Abdullah (b. 'Umar) informed him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) turned his face to the two hillocks which intervened between him and the long mountain by the side of the Ka'ba, and the mosque which had been built there was thus on the left of the hillock. Allah's Messenger's (may peace be upon him) place of prayer was lower than the black hillock, at a distance of ten cubits or near it. He (may peace be upon him) would then observe prayer facing these two hillocks of the long mountain that is intervening between you and the Ka'ba.
[2893]
Nafi' reported on the authority of Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) circumambulated the House, while observing the first circomambulation, he walked swiftly in three (circuits), and walked in four circuits, and ran in the bottom of the valley as he moved between al-Safa and al-Marwa. Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) also used to do like this.
[2894]
Ibn'Umar(Allah be pleased with them) reported that when Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) circumambulated in Hajj and Umra he walked swiftly in the first three circuit about the House, and then walked in four circuits, and then observed two rak'ahs of prayer, and then ran between al-Safa and al-Marwa.
[2895]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I saw that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Mecca and kissed the Black Stone, (in the first circurnambulation) he moved quickly in three circuits out of seven circuits.
[2896]
Nafi' reported on the authority of Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that Allaws Messenger (may peace be upon him) walked swiftly from stone to stone in three circuits and walked (normally) in four.
[2897]
Nafi' reported that Ibn Umar (Allah he pleased with them) walked swiftly from stone to stone, and stated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did like this.
[2898]
jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) walking swiftly from the Black Stone till he completed three circuits up to it.
[2899]
Jabir b. "Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) walked swiftly in three circuitsfrom stone to stone.
[2900]
Abu Tufail reported: I said to Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): Do you think that walking swiftly round the House in three circuits, and just walking in four circuits is the Sunnah (of the Holy Prophet), for your people say that it is Sunnah? Thereupon he (Ibn 'Abbas) said: They have told the truth and the lie (too). I said: What do your words "They have told the truth and the lie (too)" imply? Thereupon he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Mecca and the polytheists said that Mubammad and his Companions had emaciated and would, therefore, be unable to circumambulate the House; and they felt jealous of him (the Holy Prophet). (It was due to this) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded them to walk swiftly in three (circuits) and walk (normally) in four. I said to him: Inform me if it is Sunnah to observe Tawaf between al-Safa and al-Marwa while riding, for your people look upon it as Sunnah. He (Ibn Abbas) said: They have told the truth and the lie too. I said: What do your words "They have told the truth and the lie tool, iMply? He said: as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had come to Mecca, there was such a large gathering of people around him that even the virgins had come out of their houses (to catch a glimpse of his face). and they were saying: He is Muhammad; He is Muhammad. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (was so gentle and kind) that the people were not beaten back (to make way) in front of him. When there was a; throng (of people) around him, he rode (the she-camel) but walking and trotting is, however, better.
[2901]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of jurairi with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of words (and this is) that he (the narrator) did not say: "They felt jealous of him. but said: The people of Mecca, were jealous people."
[2902]
Abu Tufail reported: I said to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): People are of the view that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) moved quickly round the House and between al-Safa and al-Marwa, and (thus) it is Sunnah. He said: They told the truth and they told the lie.
[2903]
Abu Tufail reported; I. said to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): I think that I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He (Ibn 'Abbis) said' Give a description of him to me. I said: I saw him near al-Marwa on the back of a she- camel, and people had thronged around him. Thereupon Ibn'Abbis said: It was Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for they (the Compainions of the Holy Prophet) were neither pushed aside from him, nor were they turned away.
[2904]
Ibn 'Abbas (At lab be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and his Companions came to Mecca and the fever in Medina had weakened them. Thereupon the polytheists (of Mecca) said: There would come to you a people whom the fever has made weak and they have suffered severely from it. They sat in Hatim. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) commanded them to walk quickly ift three circuits and walk (in four) between the two corners. so that the polytheists should. see their endurance. The polytheists then said (to one anothery You were under the impression that fever had emaciated them. whereas they are stronger than so and so. Ibn Abbas said: He (the Holy Prophet) did not command them (the Muslims) to walk quickly in all the circuits out of kindness to them.
[2905]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah.'s Messenger (peace be upon him) observed Sa'i and walked quickly round the House with a view to showing his strength to the polytheists.
[2906]
Ahdullah b. Umar (reported) that he had not seen Allah's Messenger (way peace he upon him) touching anything in the House, except the two Yamani corners.
[2907]
Salim reported on the authority of his father (Allah he pleased with him) that Allah'& Messenger (tinny peace be upon him) did not touch any of the corners of the House. except that of Black Corner (in which the Black Stone is embedded and that (portion) near it, towards the houses of the tribe of jumuhi.
[2908]
Nafi' reported on the authority of 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) did not touch but the Stone and the Yamani corner.
[2909]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I have not abandoned touching of Yamani corners (and kissing of) the Stone since I saw Allah's messneger (may peace be upon him) touching them both In hardship and ease.
[2910]
NAfi' (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I saw'lbn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) touching the Stone with his hand and then kissing his hand. and he said: I have never abandoned it since I saw Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) doing It.
[2911]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) is reported to have said that he did not see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) touching other than the Yamani corners.
[2912]
Salim narrated on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that 'Umar b. al-Khattib (Allah be pleased with him) kissed (the Black Stone) and then said: By Allah, I know that you are a stone and if I were not to see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kissing you, I would not have kissed you. Harun said in his narration: A hadith like this has been transmitted to me by Zaid b. Aslam on the authority of his father Aslam.
[2913]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Umar (Allah be pleased with him) kissed the Stone and said: I am kissing you, whereas I know that you are a stone, but I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kissing you (that Is why I kiss you).
[2914]
Abdullah b. Sarjis reported: I saw the bald one, i.e. 'Umar b. Khattib (Allah be pleased with him). kissing the Stone and saying: By Allah. I am kissing with full consciousness of the fact that you are a stone and that you can neither do any harm nor good; and if I had not seen Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kissing you. I would not have kissed you. The rest of thebadith is the same.
[2915]
Abis b. Rabi'a reported: I saw 'Umar (Allah'be pleased with him) kissing the Stone and saying: I am kissing you and I know that you are a stone. And if I had not seen Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kissing you, I would not have kissed you.
[2916]
Suwaid b. Ghafala reported: I saw Umar (Allah be pleased with him) kissing the Stone and clinging to it and saying: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having great love for you. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyin with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "That he ('Umar) said: But I saw Abu'l-Qasim (way peace be upon him) having great love for you." And he did not'mention about clinging to it.
[2917]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) circumambulated the House on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage on the back of his camel and touched the Corner (of Black Stone) with a stick.
[2918]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) circumambulated the House on the back of his riding camel on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage and touched the Stone with his stick so that the people should see him, and he should be conspicuous, and they should be able to ask him (questions pertaining to religion) as the people had crowded round him.
[2919]
jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) circumambulated the House (and ran) between al-Safa and al-Marwa on the back of his she-camel, at the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage. so that the people should see him and he should be conspicuous, and they should be able to ask him (questions pertaining to religion), and the people had crowded round him. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Khashram no mention Is made of: "So that they should ask him."
[2920]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) circumambulated the Ka'ba on the back of his camel on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage and touched the corner and he did not like that the people should be pushed away from him.
[2921]
Abu Tufail reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ciscumambulati'hg the House. and touching the corner with a stick that he had with him, and then kissing the stick.
[2922]
Umm Salama reported: I made a complaint to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) of my ailment, whereupon be said: Circumambulate behind the people while riding. She said: So I circumambulated and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was at that time praying towards the side of the House and he was reciting al-Tur and a Book Inscribed (i.e. Sura Iii. of the Qur'un).
[2923]
Hisham b. 'Urwa reported on the authority of his father who narrated from 'A'isha. He said to 'A'isha: I think if a person does not run between al- Safa' and al-Marwa, It does not do any harm to him (so far as Hajj is concerned). She said: Why (do you think so)? I said: For Allah says: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah" (ii. 158) (to the end of the verse), whereupon she said: Allah does not complete the Hajj of a person or his Umra if he does not observe Sa'i between al-Safa' and al-marwa; and if it were so as you state, then (the wording would have been(fala janah an la yatufu biha)["There is no harm for him if he does not circumambulate between them'].Do you know in what context (this verse was revealed)? (It was revealed in this context) that the Ansar in the Days of Ignorance pronounced the Talbiya for two idols. (fixedl on the bank of the river which were called Isaf and Na'ila. The people went there, and then circumambulated between al-Safa' and al-Marwa and then got their heads shaved. With the advent of Islam they (the Muslims) did not like to circumambulate between them as they used to do during the Days of Ignorance. It was on account of this that Allah. the Exalted and Majestic, revealed: "Verily al-Safe and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah" to the end of the verse.She said: Then people began to observe Sa'i.
[2924]
Hisham b. 'Urwa narrated on the authority of his father who reported: I said to 'A'isha: I do not see any harm to me if I do not circumambulate betweez al-Safa' and al-Marwa. She said: On what ground do you say so? (I said:) Since Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, says: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah." It (your assertion) were (correct), it would have been said like this: "There is no harm for him, that he should not circumambulate between them." It (this verse) has been revealed about the people of Ansar. Whenever they pronounced the Talbiya, they pronounced it in the name of al-Manat during the Days of Ignorance; so they (thought) that it was not permissible for them (for the Muslims) to circumambulate between and al-Marwa. When they (the Muslims) came with Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) for Hajj, they mentioned it to him. So Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed this verse. By my life, Allah will not complete the Hajj of one who has not circumambulated between al-Safa and al-Marwa.
[2925]
'Urwa b. Zabair reported: I said to 'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): I do not see any (fault) in one who does not circumambl"te between al-Safa' and al-Marwa, and I do not mind if I do not circumambulate between them, whereupon she said: O, the son of my sister, what you say is wrong. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed Sa'i and so did the Muslims. So it is a Sunnah (of the Prophet). And it was a common practice (with the pagan Arabs) that those who pronounced Talbiya for the wretched al-Manat, situated at Mushalla, did not observe Sa'i between al-Safa' and al-Marwa. With the advent of Islam, we asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about this practice, and (it was on this occasion) that Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed this verse: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah"; so he who performed Hajj or 'Umra it is no sin on him if he circumambulates them. And if it were as you state, (then the wording would have been): "There is no harm for him, that he should not circumambulate round them." Zuhri said: I made a mention of that to Abu Bakr b. 'Abd al- Rahman b. al-Harith b. Hisham; he was impressed by that and said: This is what is called knowledge. And I have heard many a scholar saying: Many of the Arabs who did not circumambulate between al-Safa' and al-Marwa caid: Our circumambulation between these two hills is an act of ignorance; whereas others among the Ansar said: We have been commanded to circumambulate the House, and not Commanded to run between al-Safa' and al-Marwa. So Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed thia verse: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah." Abu Bakr b. 'Abd al-Rahman said: I think that this (verse) has been revealed for such and such (persons).
[2926]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported: I asked 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her); the rest of the hadith is the same. And in this hadith (these words are also found): "When they (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about this, they said: Messenger of Allah, we felt reluctant to circumambulate between al-Safa' and al-Marwa. Then Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed this verse: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of. Allah so he who perform Hajj or Umra it is no sin on him if he should circumambulate between them. 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) laid down this Sa'i between them as Sunnah (of the Holy Prophet). So it is not advisable for anyone to abandon this Sa'i between them.
[2927]
'Urwa b. Zabair narrated on the authority of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) who informed him that the Ansar and the people of the tribe of Ghassan before embracing Islam pronounced Talbiya for Manat, and so they avoided circumambulating' between al-Safa' and al-Marwa, and it was a common practice with their forefather, that he who put on Ihram for Manat did not circumambulate between al-Safa' and al-Marwa. And when they embraced Islam, they asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about it, and then Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed this verse: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah"; so he who performs Hajj or Umra, for him there is no harm if he should circumambulate between them, and he who does good spontaneously-surely Allah is Bountiful in rewarding and Knowing.
[2928]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Ansar felt reluctant that they should circumambulate between al-Safa' and al-Marwa until it was revealed: "Verily al-Safa' and al-Marwa are among the Signs of Allah"; so whoever performs Hajj or 'Umra, for him there is no harm that he should circumambulate between them.
[2929]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and his Companions did not observe Sa'i between al-Safa' and al-Marwa but only one Sa'i.
[2930]
Ibn Juraij reported on the same authority a hadith like that, and said: But one Tawaf and that was the first Tawaf.
[2931]
Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I was sitting behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the riding animal from 'Arafat. As Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) reached the left side of the mountain which was situated near Muzdalifa, he made the camel kneel down and made water and then came back. I poured water and he, performed light ablution. I then said: Messenger of Allah, it is time for prayer. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The prayer awaits you (at the next station, Muzdalifa). Allah's Messenger (may peaced be upon him) rode on until he came to Muzdalifa and observed prayer. Then al-Fadl (Allah be pleased with him) sat behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and reached (Muzdalifa) in the morning. Kuraib said: 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) narrated from al-Fadl (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) continued pronouncing Talbiya until he reached al-Jamara (al-'Aqaba).
[2932]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) made al-Fadl sit behind him (on the camel back) from the place (where the two prayers) are combined (Muzdalifa). Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) also informed that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not stop pronouncing Talbiya till he threw pebbles at Jamrat al-'Aqaba.
[2933]
Ibn 'Abbas narrated from al-Fadl b. Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) who sat behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he (the Holy Prophet) said to the people on the evening of 'Arafa and on the morning to the gathering of people (at Muzdalifa) as they were pushing on to proceed slowly. And he himself drove his she-camel with restraint until he entered Muhassir (it is a place in Mina), and further told them to take up pebbles which were to be thrown at Jamra. And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) continued pronouncing Talbiya till he stoned the Jamra. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abd Zubair with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation that in the hadith no mention is made of (this) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) continued pronouncing Talbiya till he stoned the Jamra, and he made this addition in his hadith: "The Apostle (may peace be upon him) pointed with his hand how a person should catch hold of pebbles (in order to throw them)."
[2934]
'Abdullah narrated to us as we had gathered (at Muzdalifa): I have heard from one upon whom Surah al-Baqara was revealed (the Holy Prophet) pronouncing Talbiya at this place.
[2935]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid reported that 'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) pronounced Talbiya as he returned from the gathering of the people (at Muzdalifa). It was said: He might be a Bedouin (not knowing correctly the rituals of Hajj and, therefore, pronouncing Talbia at this stage), whereupon Abdullah said: Hive the people forgotten (this Sunnah of the Holy Prophet) or have they gone astray? I heard him, upon whom Sibrah al-Baqara was revealed, pronouncing Talbiya at the very place.
[2936]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid and al-Aswad b. Yazid reported: We heard 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud saying to the gathering of people (at Muzdalifa) that he had heard Talbiya from him, upon whom Surah al-Baqara was revealed, at this very place. And so he ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) pronounced Talbiya and we also pronounced it with him.
[2937]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them). He said: As we proceeded in the morning along with AUbs Messenger (may peace be upon him) from Mina to 'Arafat, some of us prounced Talbiya, and some pronounced Takbir (Allah-o-Akbar).
[2938]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them): We were along with Allah's Messenger (way peace he upon him) in the morning of 'Arafa (9th of Dhu'l-Hijja). Some of us pronounced Takbir and some of us Tahlil La ilaha ill-Allah). And to those of us who pronounced Takbir, I said: By Allah, how strange it is that you did not care to ask him: What did you see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) doing (on this occasion)?
[2939]
Muhammad b. Abu Bakr al-Thaqafi asked Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him), while on their way from Mina to 'Arafa in the morning: What did you do on this day in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? Thereupon he said: One of us pronounced Tahlil, and he met with no disapproval, and one of us pronounced Takbir, and he also met with no disapproval.
[2940]
Muhammad b. Abu Bakr reported: I said to Anas b. Malik in the morning of 'Arafa: What do you say as to pronouncing Talbiya on this day? He said: I travelled with Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) and his Companions in this journey. Some of us pronounced Takbir and some of us pronounced Tahlil, and none of us found fault with his companion.
[2941]
Kuraib, the freed slave of Ibn Abbas, narrated from Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) that he had heard him saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) proceeded from 'Arafa, and as he approached the creek of a hill, he got down (from his camel) and urinated, and then performed a light ablution. I said to him: Prayer, whereupon he said: The prayer awaits you (at Muzdalifa). So he rode again, and as he came to Muzdalifa, he got down and performed ablution well. Then Iqima was pronounced for prayer, and he 'observed the sunset prayer. Then every person made his camel kneel down there, and then Iqama was pronounced for 'Isha' prayer and he observed it, and he (the Holy Prophet) did not observe any prayer (either Sunan or Nawifil) in between them (He observed the Fard of sunset and 'Isha' prayers successively.)
[2942]
Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on his way back from 'Arafat got down in one of these creeks (to answer the call of nature), and after he had done that I poured water (over his hands) and said: Are you going to pray? Thereupon he said: The place of prayer is ahead of you.
[2943]
Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) narrated: AHah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was on his way back from 'Arafat and as he reached the creek (of a hillock) he got down and urinated (Usama did not say that he poured water), but said: He (the Holy Prophet) called for water and performed ablution, but it was not a thorough one. I said: Messenger of Allah, the prayer ! Thereupon he said: Prayer awaits you ahead (at Muzdalifa). He then proceeded, until he reached Muzdalifa and observed sunset and 'Isha' prayers (together) there.
[2944]
Kuraib reported that he asked Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) What did you do in the evening of 'Arafa as you rode behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: We came to a valley where people generally halted their (camels) for the sunset prayer. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) halted his camel and urinated (and he did not say that he had poured water). He then called for water and performed light ablution. I said: Messenger of Allah, the prayer ! Thereupon he said: Prayer awaits you (at Muzdalifa). and he rode on until we came to Muzdalifa. Then he offered the sunset prayer. and the people halted their camels at their places, and did not untie them until Iqama was pronounced for the 'Isha' prayer and he observed the prayer, and then they untied (their camels). I said: What did you do in the morning? He said: Al-Fadl b. Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) sat behind him (the Holy Prophet) in the morning, whereas I proceeded on foot with the Quraish who had gone ahead.
[2945]
Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace jbe upod him) came to the valley where the rich (people of Mecca) used to get down. he got down. and urinated (and he did not mention about pouring water); he then called for water and performed a light ablution. I said: Messenger of Allah, the prayer I Thereupon he said: Prayer awaits you ahead.
[2946]
Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) reported that he sat behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on his ride as he came back from 'Arafa. And as he came to the valley, he halted his camel, and then went to the wilderness (to urinate). And when he came back, I poured water on him from the jug and he performed ablution, and then rode on until he came to Muzdalifa and there he combined the sunset and 'Isha' prayers.
[2947]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon, him) came back from 'Arafa and Usama (Allah be pleased with him) was seated behind him. Usama said that he (the Holy Prophet) continued the journey in this very state until he came to Muzdalifa.
[2948]
Hisham (Allah be pleased with him) reported from his father: Usama (Allah be pleased with him) was asked in my presence or I asked Usama b. Zaid andhe rode behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he came back from 'Arafat. I said (to him): How did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) journey as he came back from 'Arafat? Thereupon he said: He made it (his riding camel) walk at a slow speed, and when he found an open space, he made it walk briskly.
[2949]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters. and in the hadith narrated by Humaid there is an addition (of these words): "Hisham said: Al-nass (speed of camel) is faster than al-'anaq."
[2950]
Abdullah b. Yazid al-Khatmi reported on the authority of Abu Ayyub (Allah be pleased with him) that he prayed the sunset and 'Isha' prayers (together) at Muzdalifa in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage.
[2951]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed the sunset and 'Isha' prayers together at Muzdalifa.
[2952]
Ubaidullah b. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) combined the sunset and 'Isha', prayers at Muzdalifa and there was no prostration (i.e. any rak'ahs of Sunan or Nawafil prayers) in between them. He observed three rak'ahs of the sunset prayer and two rak'ahs of the 'Isha' prayer, and 'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) observed the prayers in this very manner (at Muzdalifa) until he met his Lord.
[2953]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported that he observed the sunset and 'Isha' prayers at Muzdalifa with (one) iqama. He narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that he observed prayers like this. and Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) narrated that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did like this. Shu'ba reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters and said : He (the Holy Prophet) observed the two prayers (together) with one iqama.
[2954]
Ibn 'Umar rep rte that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) combined the sunset and 'Isha ' prayers at Muzdalifa. He observed three rak'ahs of the sunset prayer and two rak'ahs of the 'Isha' prayer with one Iqama.
[2955]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: We came back along with Ibn 'Umar till we reached Muzdalifa. There he led us in the sunset and 'Isha' prayers with one iqama and we then proceeded and he said: This is how Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) led us in prayer at this place.
[2956]
A'bdullah (b. 'Umar) reported: I have never seen Allah's Messenger, (may peace be upon him) but observing the prayers at their appointed times except two players, sunset and 'Isha,' at Muzdalifa (where he deferred the sunset prayer to combine it with 'Isha' and he observed the dawn prayer before its stipulated time on that day (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja).
[2957]
This badith has been transmitted by A'mash with a slight variation of words, i.e. he said before its time when it was still dark.
[2958]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Sauda (the wife of the Holy Prophet) who was bulky sought the permission of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the night of Muzdalifa to move from (that place) ahead of him and before the multitude (set forth). He (Allah's Apostle) gave her the permission. So she set forth before his (Holy Prophet's) departure. But we stayed there until it was dawn and we moved on, when he departed. And if I were to seek the permission of Allah's Messenger.(may peace be upon him) as Sauda had sought permission, I could have also gone with his permission and it would have been better for me than that for which I was happy.
[2959]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that (hadrat) Sauda was a bulky lady, so she sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to proceed from Muzdalifa (to Mina) in the (latter part of the) night. He granted her permission. 'A'isha said: I wish I had also sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as Sauda had. sought permission from him. 'A'isha did not proceed but with the Imam.
[2960]
'A'isha said: I wish I had sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as Sauda had sought, and observed the dawn prayer at Mina and stoned at al-Jamra before the people had come there. It was said to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her): Did Sauda seek permission from him (the Holy Prophet)? She said: Yes. She was a bulky lady and so she sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (to proceed to mina from Muzdalifa ahead of him), and he granted her permission.
[2961]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'Abd al-Rahman b. al-Qasim with the same chain of transmitters.
[2962]
Abdullah, the freed slave of (Hadrat) Asma', reported: Asma' (Allah be pleased with her), as she was in the house at Muzdalifa, asked me whether the moon had set. I said: No. She prayed for some time, and again said: My son has the moon set ? I said: Yes. And she said: Set forth along with me, and so we set forth until (we reached Mini) and the stoned at al-Jamra. She then prayed in her place. I said to her: Respected lady, we set forth (in the very early part of dawn) when it was dark, whereupon she said: My son, there is no harm in it; Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had granted permission to women. This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters, and In his narration (the words are): "She (Asma') said: My son, Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) granted permission to women."
[2963]
Ibn Shawwal (the freed slave of Umm Habiba) reported that he went to Umm Habiba (the wife of Allah's Apostle) who informed him that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sent her from Muzdalifa during the night.
[2964]
It is narrated from Umm Habiba: We used to set forth from Muzdalifa to Mina, (very early in the dawn) when it was dark. And in the narration of Naqid (the words are): "We set from Muzdalifa in the darkness (of the dawn)."
[2965]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me from Muzdalifa ahead (of the caravan) along with the luggage or with the weak ones during (the latter part of the) night.
[2966]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I was among those (i.e. women and children) whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent forth with the weak members of his family.
[2967]
This hadith has been transmitted by Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) with a slight variation of words.
[2968]
'Ata' reported from Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me from Muzdalifa along with his luggage (in the very early part of @he dawn). I (Ibn Juraij, one of the narrators) said (to 'Ati') : Has this (news) reached you that Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) had said: "He (Allah's Messenger) had sent me in the latter p4art of the night" ?Thereupon he said: No, it was the dawn. I (again) said to him: (Did you hear) Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) having said this (too): "We stoned al-Jamra before the dawn prayer"? So where did he observe the dawn prayer? He said: No. But he said only so much (as described above).
[2969]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported that 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) used to send ahead of him the weak members of his household to stay during the night at Mash'ar al-Haram at Muzdalifa. They remembered Allah so long as they could afford, and then they proceeded before the stay of the Imam, and before his return. So some of them reached Mina for the dawn prayer and some of them reached there after that; and as they reached there, they stoned al-Jamra; and Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) used to say: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has granted this concession to them.
[2970]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid reported that 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud (Allah be pleased with them) threw seven pebbles at Jamrat al-'Aqaba from the heart of the valley. He pronounced Takbir with every pebble. It was said to him that people fling stones from the upper side (of the valley), whereupon 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud (Allah he pleased with them) said: By him, besides Whom there is no other god, that is the place (of flinging stones) of one upon whom Surah al-Baqara was revealed (the Holy Prophet).
[2971]
A'mash reported: I heard Hajjaj b. Yusuf saying as he was delivering sermon on the pulpit: Observe the order of the (Holy) Qur'an which has been observed by Gabriel. (Thus state the surahs in this manner) "one in which mention has been made of al-Baqara," "one in which mention has been made of women (Surah al-Nisa')" and then the surah in which mention has been made of the Family of 'Imrin. He (the (narrator) said: I met Ibrahim and informed him about these words of his (the statement of Hajjaj b. Yusuf). He cursed him and said: Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid has narrated to me that when he was in the company of 'Abdullah b. Mas'udd (Allah be pleased with them) he came to Jamrat al-'Aqaba and then entered the heart of the valley and faced towards it (the Jamra) and then flung seven pebbles at it from the heart of the valley pronouncing Takbir with every pebble. I said: Abu 'Abd al-Rahman, people fling pebbles at it (Jamra) from the upper side, whereupon he said: By Him besides Whom there is no god, that is the place (of flinging pebbles of one) upon whom Surah al-Baqara was revealed;
[2972]
A'mash reported: I heard Hajjaj saying I Do not say Surah al-Baqara. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2973]
Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid reported that he performed Hajj along with 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) and he flung seven pebbles at al-Jamra (from a position) that the House was on his left and Mina was on his right and said: That is the place (of flinging pebbles of one) upon whom Surah al-Baqara was revealed.
[2974]
This hadith nas been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters except with this variation of (words): As he came to Jamrat al-'Aqaba."
[2975]
Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid reported: It was said to 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with bird) that people threw pebbles at the Jamra from the upper side of 'Aqaba, whereas he threw stones at it from the heart of the valley, whereupon he said: By Him besides Whom there is no god, it is at this very place that one upon whom was revealed Surah al-Baqara threw stones at it.
[2976]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) flinging pebbles while riding his camel on the Day of Nahr, and he was saying: Learn your rituals (by seeing me performing them), for I do not know whether I would be performing Hajj after this Hajj of mine.
[2977]
Umm al-Husain (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I performed Hajj along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage and saw him when he flung pebbles at Jamrat al-'Aqaba and returned while he was riding the camel, and Bilal and Usama were with him. One of them was leading his camel, while the other was raising his cloth over the head of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to protect him from the sun. She (further) said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said so many things, and I heard him saying: If a slave having some limb of his missing and having dark complexion is appointed to govern you according to the Book of Allah the Exalted. listen to him and obey him.
[2978]
Umm al-Husain (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I performed Hajj along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage and saw Usama and Bilal (too), one of whom had caught hold of the lose string of the she-camel of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) while the other one was raising his cloth (over his head) protecting him from the heat, till he flung pebbles at Jamrat al-'Aqaba.
[2979]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) throwing stones (at Jamrat al 'Aqaba) like pelting of small pebbles.
[2980]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) flung pebbles at jamra on the Day of Nahr after sunrise, and after that (i.e. on the 11th, 12th and 13th of Dhu'l-Hijja when the sun had declined.
[2981]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[2982]
Jabir (b. Abdullab) (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Odd number of stones are to be used for cleaning (the private parts after answering the call of nature), and casting of pebbles at the Jamras is to be done by odd numbers (seven), and (the number) of circuits between al-Safa' and al-Marwa is also odd (seven), and the number of circuits (around the Ka'ba) is also odd (seven). Whenever any one of you is required to use stones (for cleaning the private parts) he should use odd number of stones (three, five or seven).
[2983]
'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got his head shaved (after slaughtering the sacrificial animal on the 10th of Dhu'l-Hijja), and so did a group of Companions, while some of them got their hair clipped. Abdullah said: Allah's Messenger (may peace'be upon him) observed once or twice: "May Allah have mercy upon those who get their heads shaved." And he also said: "Upon those too who got their hair clipped."
[2984]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having observed: O Allah, have mercy upon those who get their heads shaved. They (the Companions) said: Messenger of Allah, (what about those) who have got their hair clipped? He said: O Allah, have mercy upon those who have got their heads shaved. They (again) said: Allah's Messenger, (what about those) who have got their hair clipped? Thereupon he said: (O Allah, have mercy upon those) who have got their hair clipped.
[2985]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: May Allah have mercy upon those who have got their heads shaved. They said: Messenger of Allah, (what about) those who got their hair clipped? He said: May Allah have mercy upon those who have got their heads shaved. They said: Messenger of Allah, (what about those who have got their hair clipped)? He said: May Allah have mercy upon those who got their hair shaved. They said: Messenger of Allah, (what about) those who got their hair clipped? He said: (O Allah, have mercy upon) those who got their hair clipped.
[2986]
Ubaidullah reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters and (it is said) that it was on the fourth turn that he (the Holy Prophet) said: (May Allah have mercy upon) those who got their hair clipped."
[2987]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said: O Allah, grant pardon to those who got their heads shaved They (Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: Messenger of Allah, (what about those) who get their hair cut? He said: O Allah, grant pardon to those who get their heads shaved. They said: Messenger of Allah, (what about those) who got their hair clipped? He said: O Allah, grant pardon to those who get their heads shaved. They said: Messenger of Allah, (what about those) who get their hair clipped? He said: O Allah, grant pardon to those who get their heads shaved. They said: (What about those) who get their hair clipped? He said: (O Allah, grant pardon to) those who get their hair clipped.
[2988]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[2989]
Yahya b. al-Husain reported on the authority of his grandfather that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) invoked blessing on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage three times for those who got their heads shaved and once for those who got their hair clipped. In the narration transmitted by Waki' there is no mention of the Farewell Pilgrimage.
[2990]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got his head shaved on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage.
[2991]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased wish him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Mina; he went to the Jamra and threw pebbles at it, after which he went to his lodging in Mina,and sacrificed the animal. He then called for a barber and, turning his right side to him, let him shave him; after which he tiimed his left side. He then gave (these hair) to the people.
[2992]
Abu Bakr reported: (He called for) the barber and, pointing towards the right side of his head, said: (Start from) here, and then distributed his hair among those who were near him. He then pointed to the barber (to shave) the left side and he shaved it, and he gave (these hair) to Umm Sulaim (Allah be pleased with her). And in the narration of Abu Kuraib (the words are): "He started from the right half (of his head), and he distributed a hair or two among the people. and then (asked the barber) to shave the left side and he did similarly, and he (the Holy Prophet) said: Here is Abu Talha and he gave these (hair) to Abu Talha."
[2993]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) threw stones at Jamrat al-'Aqaba. He then want to his sacrificial animal and sacrificed it, and there was sitting the barber, and he pointed with his hand towards his head, and he shaved the right half of it, and he (the Holy Prophet) distributed them (the hair) among those who were near him. And he again said: Shave the other half, and said: Where is Abu Talha and gave it (the hair) to him.
[2994]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had thrown pebbles at the Jamra and had sacrificed the animal, he turned (the right side) of his head towards the barber, and i.e shaved it. He then called Abu Talha al-Ansari and gave it to him. He then turned his left side and asked him (the barber) to shave. And he (the barber) shaved. and gave it to Abu Talha and told him to distribute it amongst the people.
[2995]
Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stopped during the Farewell Pilgrimage at Mina for people who had something to ask. A man came and said: Messenger of Allah, being ignorant. I shaved before sacrificing, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Now sacrifice (the animal) and there is no harm (for you). Then another man came and he said: Messenger of Allah, being ignorant, I sacrificed before throwing the pebbles, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: (Now) throw the pebbles, and there is no harm (for you). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was not asked about anything which had been done before or after (its proper time) but he said: Do it, and no harm is there (for you).
[2996]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stopped while riding his camel and the people began to ask him. One of the inquirers said: Messenger of Allah, I did not know that pebbles should be thrown before sacrificing the animal, and by mistake I sacrificed the animal before throwing pebbles, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: (Now) throw pebbles and there is no harm in it.Then another(person) came saying: I did not know that the animal was to be sacrificed before shaving, but I got myself shaved before sacrificing the animal, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Sacrifice the animal (now) and there is no harm in it. He (the narrator) said: I did not hear that anything was asked on that day (shout a matter) which a person forgot and could not observe the sequence or anything like it either due to forgetfulness or ignorance, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said (about that): Do it; there is no harm in it.
[2997]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri.
[2998]
Abdullah b. Amr b. al-'As (Allah be pleased with them) reported: As Allah's Apostle. (may peace be upon him) was delivering sermon on the Day of Nahr, a man stood up before him and said: Messenger of Allah, I did not know that such and such (rite was to be performed) before such and such (rite). Then another man came and said: Messenger of Allah, I thought that such and such (rite) should precede such and such (rite), and then another man came and said: Messenger of Allah, I had thought that such and such was before such and such, and such and such (is the sequence) of the three (rites, viz. throwing of pebbles, sacrificing of animal and shaving of one's head). He said to all these three : Do now (if you have not observed the cequence); there is no harm in it.
[2999]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters. And the narration of Ibn Bakr is like one transmitted by 'Isa but with this (variation): "There are not these words in it: To all these three rites (throwing of pebbles sacrificing of animal and shaving of one's head)." And so far as the narration of Yahya al-Umawi (the words are): I got (my head) shaved before I sacrificed the animal, and I sacrified the animal before throwing pebbles, and like that.
[3000]
Adullah b. 'Amr (b. al-'As) (Allah be pleased with him) reported that a person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I got (my head) shaved before sacrificing the ,animal, whereupon be (the Holy Prophet) said: Sacrifice the animal (now); there is no harm in it. He (the person said): I sacripced the animal before throwingpebbles. whereupon he said: Throw pebbles (now); there is no harm in it.